ON POPULAR EDUCATION 


Leo Tolstoy 
1875 

From: THE COMPLETE WORKS OF COUNT TOLSTOY, VOLUME XII 
(Pages 251 to 326 of the original text) 

Translated from the Original Russian and edited by Leo Wiener, Assistant Professor of 

Slavic Languages at Harvard University 

Publishers: Dana Estes & Company, Boston, 1904 


ON POPULAR EDUCATION 


I SUPPOSE each of us has had more than one occasion to come in contact with monstrous, 
senseless phenomena, and to find back of these phenomena put forward some important 
principle, which overshadowed those phenomena, so that in our youthful and even maturer years 
we began to doubt whether it was true that those phenomena were monstrous, and whether we 
were not mistaken. And having been unable to convince ourselves that monstrous phenomena 
might be good, or that the protection of an important principle was illegitimate, or that the 
principle was only a word, we remained in regard to those phenomena in an ambiguous, 
undecided condition. 

In such a state I was, and I assume many of us are, in respect to the principle of “development” 
which obfuscates pedagogy, in its connection with the rudiments. But popular education is too 
near to my heart, and I have busied myself too much with it, to remain too long in indecision. 
The monstrous phenomena of the imaginary development I could not call good, nor could I be 
persuaded that the development of the pupil was bad, and so I began to inquire what that 
development was. I do not consider it superfluous to communicate the deductions to which I 
have been led during the study of this matter. 

To define what is understood by the word “development," I shall take the manuals of Messrs. 
Bunakov and Evtushevski, as being new works, which combine all the latest deductions of 
German pedagogy, intended as guides for the teachers in the popular schools, and selected by the 
advocates of the sound method as manuals in their schools. 

In discussing what is to form the foundation for a choice of this or that method for the teaching 
of reading, Mr. Bunakov says: 

“No, an opinion about the method of construction based on such near-sighted and flimsy 
foundations (that is, on experience) will be too doubtful. Only the theoretical substratum, based 
on the study of human nature, can make the judgments in this sphere firm and independent of all 
casualties, and to a considerable degree guard them against gross errors. Consequently for the 


1 



final choice of the best method of teaching the rudiments, it is necessary first of all to stand on 
theoretic soil, on the basis of previous considerations, the general conditions of which give to 
this or that method the actual right to be called satisfactory from the pedagogical standpoint. 
These conditions are: (1) It has to be a method which is capable of developing the child's mental 
powers, so that the acquisition of the rudiments may be obtained together with the development 
and the strengthening of the reasoning powers. (2) It must introduce into the instruction the 
child's personal interest, so that the matter be furthered by this interest, and not by dulling 
violence. (3) It must represent in itself the process of self-instruction, inciting, supporting, and 
directing the child's self-activity. (4) It must be based on the impressions of hearing, as of the 
sense which serves for the acquisition of language. (5) It has to combine analysis with synthesis, 
beginning with the dismemberment of the complex whole into simple principles, and passing 
over to the composition of a complex whole out of the simple principles." 

So this is what the method of instruction is to be based upon. I will remark, not for contradiction, 
but for the sake of simplicity and clearness, that the last two statements are quite superfluous, 
because without the union of analysis and synthesis there can be not only no instruction, but also 
no other activity of the mind, and every instruction, except that of the deaf and dumb, is based on 
the sense of hearing. These two conditions are put down only for beauty's sake and for the 
obscuration of the style, so common in pedagogical treatises, and so have no meaning whatever. 
The first three at first sight appear quite true as a programme. Everybody, of course, would like 
to know how the method is secured that will “develop," that will “introduce into the instruction 
the pupil's personal interest," and that will “represent the process of self-instruction." 

But to the questions as to why this method combines all those qualities you will find an answer 
neither in the books of Messrs. Bunakov and Evtushevski, nor in any other pedagogical work of 
the founders of this school of pedagogy, unless they be those hazy discussions of this nature, 
such as that every instruction must be based on the union of analysis and synthesis, and by all 
means on the sense of hearing, and so forth; or you will find, as in Mr. Evtushevski's book, 
expositions about how in man are formed impressions, sensations, representations, and concepts, 
and you will find the rule that "it is necessary to start from the object and lead the pupil up to the 
idea, and not start with the idea, which has no point of contact in his consciousness," and so 
forth. After such discussions there always follows the conclusion that therefore the method 
advocated by the pedagogue gives that exclusive real development which it was necessary to 
find. 

After the above-cited definition of what a good method ought to be, Mr. Bunakov explains how 
children ought to be educated, and, having given an exposition of all the methods, which in my 
opinion and experience lead to results which are diametrically opposite to development, he says 
frankly and definitely: 

"From the standpoint of the above-mentioned fundamental principles for estimating the value of 
the satisfactoriness of the methods of rudimentary instruction, the method which we have just 
elucidated in its general features presents the following plastic qualities and peculiarities: (1) As 
a sound method it wholly preserves the characteristic peculiarities of all sound method, — it starts 
from the impressions of hearing, at once establishing the regular relation to language, and only 
later adds to them the impressions of sight, thus clearly distinguishing sound, matter, and the 


2 



letter, its representation. (2) As a method which unites reading with writing it begins with 
decomposition and passes over to composition, combining analysis with synthesis. (3) As a 
method which passes over to the study of words and sounds from the study of objects it proceeds 
along a natural path, cooperates with the regular formation of concepts and ideas, and acts in a 
developing way on all the sides of the child's nature: it incites the children to be observant, to 
group their observations, to render them orally; it develops the external senses, mind, 
imagination, memory, the gift of speech, concentration, self-activity, the habit of work, the 
respect for order. (4) As a method which provides ample work to all the mental powers of the 
child, it introduces into instruction the personal interest, rousing in children willingness and love 
of work, and transforming it into a process of self-instruction." 

This is precisely what Mr. Evtushevski does; but why it is all so remains inexplicable to him who 
is looking for actual reasons and does not become entangled in such words as psychology, 
didactics, methodics, heuristics. I advise all those who have no inclination for philosophy and 
therefore have no desire to verify all those deductions of the pedagogues not to be embarrassed 
by these words and to be assured that a thing which is not clear cannot be the basis of anything, 
least of all of such an important and simple thing as popular education. 

All the pedagogues of this school, especially the Germans, the founders of the school, start with 
the false idea that those philosophical questions which have remained as questions for all the 
philosophers from Plato to Kant, have been definitely settled by them. They are settled so 
definitely that the process of the acquisition by man of impressions, sensations, concepts, 
ratiocinations, has been analyzed by them down to its minutest details, and the component parts 
of what we call the soul or the essence of man have been dissected and divided into parts by 
them, and that, too, in such a thorough manner that on this firm basis can go up the faultless 
structure of the science of pedagogy. This fancy is so strange that I do not regard it as necessary 
to contradict it, more especially as I have done so in my former pedagogical essays. All I will say 
is that those philosophical considerations which the pedagogues of this school put at the basis of 
their theory not only fail to be absolutely correct, not only have nothing in common with real 
philosophy, but even lack a clear, definite expression with which the majority of the pedagogues 
might agree. 

But, perchance, the theory of the pedagogues of the new school, in spite of its unsuccessful 
references to philosophy, has some value in itself. And so we will examine it, to see what it 
consists in. Mr. Bunakov says: 

"To these little savages (that is, the pupils) must be imparted the main order of school 
instruction, and into their consciousness must be introduced such initial concepts as they will 
have to come in contact with from the start, during the first lessons of drawing, reading, writing, 
and every elementary instruction, such as: the right side and the left, to the right — to the left, up 
- down, near by around, in front — in back, close by in the distance, before — behind, above 
below, fast slow, softly aloud, and so forth. No matter how simple these concepts may be, I know 
from practice that even city children, from well-to-do families, are frequently, when they come 
to the elementary schools, unable to distinguish the right side from the left. I assume that there is 
no need of expatiating on the necessity of explaining such concepts to village children, for any 
one who has had to deal with village schools knows this as well as I do." 


3 



And Mr. Evtushevski says: "Without entering into the broad field of the debatable question about 
the innate ability of man, we only see that the child can have no innate concepts and ideas about 
real things, — they have to be formed, and on the skill with which they are formed by the 
educator and teacher depends both their regularity and their permanency. In watching the 
development of the child's soul one has to be much more cautious than in attending to his body. 
If the food for the body and the various bodily exercises are carefully chosen both as regards 
their quantity and their quality, in conformity with the man's growth, so much more cautious 
have we to be in the choice of food and exercises for the mind. A badly placed foundation will 
precariously support what is fastened to it." 

Mr. Bunakov advises that ideas be imparted as follows: "The teacher may begin a conversation 
such as he deems fit: one will ask every pupil for his name; another about what is going on 
outside; a third about where each comes from, where he lives, what is going on at home, and 
then he may pass over to the main subject. 'Where are you sitting now? Why did you come here? 
What are we going to do in this room? Yes, we are going to study in this room, — so let us call it 
a class-room. See what there is under your feet, below you. Look, but do not say anything. The 
one I will tell to speak shall answer. Tell me, what do you see under your feet? Repeat 
everything we have found out and have said about this room: in what room are we sitting? What 
are the parts of the room? What is there on the walls? What is standing on the floor?' 

"The teacher from the start establishes the order which is necessary for the success of his work: 
each pupil is to answer only when asked to do so; all the others are to listen and should be able to 
repeat the words of the teacher and of their companions; the desire to answer, when the teacher 
directs a question to everybody, is to be expressed by raising the left hand; the words are to be 
pronounced neither in a hurry, nor by drawing them out, but loudly, distinctly, and correctly. To 
obtain this latter result the teacher gives them a living example by his loud, correct, distinct 
enunciation, showing them in practice the difference between soft and loud, distinct and correct, 
slow and fast. The teacher should see to it that all the children take part in the work, by having 
somebody's question answered or repeated, now by one, now by another, and now by the whole 
class at once, but especially by rousing the indifferent, inattentive, and playful children: he first 
he must enliven by frequent questions, the second he must cause to concentrate themselves on 
the subject of the common work, and the third he must curb. During the first period the children 
ought to answer in full, that is, by repeating the question: 'We are sitting in the class-room' (and 
not in brief, 'In the class-room'); 'Above, over my head, I see the ceiling; 'On the left I see three 
windows,' and so forth." 

Mr. Evtushevski advises that in this way be begun all the lessons on numbers from 1 to 10, of 
which there are to be 120, and which are to be continued through the year. 

"One. The teacher shows the pupils a cube, and asks: 'How many cubes have I?' and taking 
several cubes into the other hand, he asks, 'And how many are there here?' — 'Many, a few.' 

" 'Name here in the class-room an object of which there are several.' — ' Bench, window, wall, 
copy-book, pencil, slate-pencil, pupil, and so forth.' — 'Name an object of which there is only one 
in the class-room.' 'The blackboard, stove, door, ceiling, floor, picture, teacher, and so forth.' — 'If 


4 



I put this cube away in my pocket, how many cubes will there be left in my hand?' - 'Not one.' — 
'And how many must I again put into my hand, to have as many as before ? "One.' 'What is 
meant by saying that Petya fell down once? How many times did Petya fall? Did he fall another 
time ? Why does it say once ?' — 'Because we are speaking only of one case and not of another 
case.' 'Take your slates (or copy-books). Make on them a line of this size.' (The teacher draws on 
the blackboard a line two or four inches in length, or shows on the ruler that length.)' Rub it off. 
How many lines are left?' — 'Not one.' 'Draw several such lines.' It would be unnatural to invent 
any other exercises in order to acquaint the children with number one. It suffices to rouse in them 
that conception of unity which they, no doubt, had previous to their school instruction." 

Then Mr. Bunakov speaks of exercises on the board, and so on, and Mr. Evtushevski of the 
number four with its decomposition. Before examining the theory itself of the transmission of 
ideas, the question involuntarily arises whether that theory is not mistaken in its very problem. 
Has the condition of the pedagogical material with which it has to do been correctly defined? 
The first thing that startles us is the strange relation to some imaginary children, to such as I, at 
least, have never seen in the Russian Empire. The conversations, and the information which they 
impart, refer to children of less than two years of age, because two-year-old children know all 
that is contained in them, but as to the questions which have to be asked, they have reference to 
parrots. Any pupil of six, seven, eight, or nine years will not understand a thing in these 
questions, because he knows all about that, and cannot make out what it all means. The demands 
for such conversations evince either complete ignorance, or a desire to ignore that degree of 
development on which the pupils stand. 

Maybe the children of Hottentots and negroes, or some German children, do not know what is 
imparted to them in such conversations, but Russian children, except demented ones, all those 
who come to a school, not only know what is up and what down, what is a bench and what a 
table, what is two and what one, and so forth, but, in my experience, the peasant children who 
are sent to school by their parents can every one of them express their thoughts well and 
correctly, can understand another person's thought (if it is expressed in Russian), and can count 
to twenty and more; playing with knuckle -bones they count in pairs and sixes, and they know 
how many points and pairs there are in a six. Frequently the pupils who came to my school 
brought with them the problem with the geese, and explained it to me. But even if we admit that 
children possess no such conceptions as those the pedagogues want to impart to them by means 
of conversations, I do not find the method chosen by them to be correct. 

Thus, for example, Mr. Bunakov has written a reader. This book is to be used in conjunction 
with the conversations to teach the children language. I have run through the book and have 
found it to be a series of bad language blunders, wherever extracts from other books are not 
quoted. The same complete ignorance of language I have found in Mr. Evtushevski's problems. 
Mr. Evtushevski wants to give ideas by means of problems. First of all he ought to have seen to 
it that the tool for the transmission of ideas, that is, the language, was correct. 

What has been mentioned here refers to the form in which the development is imparted. Let us 
look at the contents themselves. Mr. Bunakov proposes the following questions to be put to the 
children: "Where can you see cats? where a magpie? where sand? where a wasp and a suslik? 
what are a suslik and a magpie and a cat covered with, and what are the parts of their bodies?" 


5 



(The suslik is a favourite animal of pedagogy, no doubt because not one peasant child in the 
centre of Russia knows that word.) 

"Naturally the teacher does not always put these questions straight to the children, as forming the 
predetermined programme of the lesson; more frequently the small and undeveloped children 
have to be led up to the solution of the question of the programme by a series of suggestive 
questions, by directing their attention to the side of the subject which is more correct at the given 
moment, or by inciting them to recall something from their previous observations. Thus the 
teacher need not put the question directly: 'Where can a wasp be seen?' but, turning to this or that 
pupil, he may ask him whether he has seen a wasp, where he has seen it, and then only, 
combining the replies of several pupils, compose an answer to the first question of his 
programme. In answering the teacher's questions, the children will often connect several remarks 
that have no direct relation to the matter; for example, when the question is about what the parts 
of a magpie are, one may say irrelevantly that a magpie jumps, another that it chatters funnily, a 
third that it steals things, let them add and give utterance to everything that arises in their 
memory or imagination, it is the teacher's business to concentrate their attention in accordance 
with the programme, and these remarks and additions of the children he should take notice of for 
the purpose of elaborating the other parts of the programme. In viewing a new subject, the 
children at every convenient opportunity return to the subjects which have already been under 
consideration. Since they have observed that a magpie is covered with feathers, the teacher asks: 
'Is the suslik also covered with feathers? What is it covered with? And what is a chicken covered 
with? and a horse? and a lizard? 'When they have observed that a magpie has two legs, the 
teacher asks: 'How many legs has a dog? and a fox? and a chicken? and a wasp? What other 
animals do you know with two legs? with four? with six?' 

Involuntarily the question arises: Do the children know, or do they not know, what is so well 
explained to them in these conversations? If the pupils know it all, then, upon occasion, in the 
street or at home, where they do not need to raise their left hands, they will certainly be able to 
tell it in more beautiful and more correct Russian than they are ordered to do. They will certainly 
not say that a horse is "covered" with wool; if so, why are they compelled to repeat these 
questions just as the teacher has put them? But if they do not know them (which is not to be 
admitted except as regards the suslik), the question arises: by what will the teacher be guided in 
what is with so much unction called the programme of questions, — by the science of zoology, or 
by logic? or by the science of eloquence? But if by none of the sciences, and merely by the desire 
to talk about what is visible in the objects, there are so many visible things in objects, and they 
are so diversified, that a guiding thread is needed to show what to talk upon, whereas in objective 
instruction there is no such thread, and there can be none. 

All human knowledge is subdivided for the purpose that it may more conveniently be gathered, 
united, and transmitted, and these subdivisions are called sciences. But outside their scientific 
classifications you may talk about objects anything you please, and you may say all the nonsense 
imaginable, as we actually see. In any case, the result of the conversation will be that the children 
are either made to learn by heart the teacher's words about the suslik, or to change their own 
words, place them in a certain order (not always a correct order), and to memorize and repeat 
them. For this reason all the manuals of this kind, in general all the exercises of development, 
suffer on the one hand from absolute arbitrariness, and on the other from superfluity. For 


6 



example, in Mr. Bunakov's book the only story which, it seems, is not copied from another 
author, is the following: 

"A peasant complained to a hunter about his trouble: a fox had carried off several of his chickens 
and one duck; the fox was not in the least afraid of watch-dog Dandy, who was chained up and 
kept barking all night long; in the morning he had placed a trap with a piece of roast meat in the 
fresh tracks on the snow, evidently the red-haired sneak was disporting near the house, but he did 
not go into the trap. The hunter listened to what the peasant had to say to him, and said: 'Very 
well; now we will see who will be shrewder!' The hunter walked all day with his gun and with 
his dog, over the tracks of the fox, to discover how he found his way into the yard. In the 
daytime the sneak sleeps in his lair, and knows nothing of what is going on, so that had to be 
considered: on its path the hunter dug a hole and covered it with boards, dirt, and snow; a few 
steps from it he put down a piece of horseflesh. In the evening he seated himself with a loaded 
gun in his ambush, fixed things in such a way that he could see everything and shoot 
comfortably, and there he waited. It grew dark. The moon swam out. Cautiously, looking around 
and listening, the fox crept out of his lair, raised his nose, and sniffed. He at once smelled the 
odour of horseflesh, and ran at a slow trot to the place, and suddenly stopped and pricked his 
ears: the shrewd one saw that there was a mound there which had not been in that spot the 
previous evening. This mound apparently vexed him, and made him think; he took a large circle 
around it, and sniffed and listened, and sat down, and for a long time looked at the meat from a 
distance, so that the hunter could not shoot him, it was too far. The fox thought and thought, and 
suddenly ran at full speed between the meat and the mound. Our hunter was careful, and did not 
shoot. He knew that the sneak was merely trying to find out whether anybody was sitting behind 
that mound; if he had shot at the running fox, he would certainly have missed him, and then he 
would not have seen the sneak, any more than he could see his own ears. Now the fox quieted 
down, the mound no longer disturbed him: he walked briskly up to the meat, and ate it with great 
delight. Then the hunter aimed carefully, without haste, so that he might not miss him. Bang! 
The fox jumped up from pain and fell down dead." 

Everything is arbitrary here: it is an arbitrary invention to say that a fox could carry off a 
peasant's duck in winter, that peasants trap foxes, that a fox sleeps in the daytime in his lair (for 
he sleeps only at night); arbitrary is that hole which is uselessly dug in winter and covered with 
boards without being made use of; arbitrary is the statement that the fox eats horseflesh, which 
he never does; arbitrary is the supposed cunning of the fox, who runs past the hunter; arbitrary 
are the mound and the hunter, who does not shoot for fear of missing, that is, everything, from 
beginning to end, is bosh, for which any peasant boy might arraign the author of the story, if he 
could talk without raising his hand. 

Then a whole series of so-called exercises in Mr. Bunakov's lessons is composed of such 
questions as: "Who bakes? Who chops? Who shoots?" to which the pupil is supposed to answer: 
"The baker, the wood-chopper, and the marksmen," whereas he might just as correctly answer 
that the woman bakes, the axe chops, and the teacher shoots, if he has a gun. Another arbitrary 
statement in that book is that the throat is a part of the mouth, and so on. 

All the other exercises, such as "The ducks fly, and the dogs?" or "The linden and birch are trees, 
and the horse?" are quite superfluous. Besides, it must be observed that if such conversations are 


7 



really carried on with the pupils (which never happens) that is, if the pupils are permitted to 
speak and ask questions, the teacher, choosing simple subjects (they are most difficult), is at each 
step perplexed, partly through ignorance, and partly because ein Narr kann mehr fragen, als zehn 
Weise antworten. 

Exactly the same takes place in the instruction of arithmetic, which is based on the same 
pedagogical principle. Either the pupils are informed in the same way of what they already 
know, or they are quite arbitrarily informed of combinations of a certain character that are not 
based on anything. The lesson mentioned above and all the other lessons up to ten are merely 
information about what the children already know. If they frequently do not answer questions of 
that kind, this is due to the fact that the question is either wrongly expressed in itself, or wrongly 
expressed as regards the children. The difficulty which the children encounter in answering a 
question of that character is due to the same cause which makes it impossible for the average boy 
to answer the question: Three sons were to Noah 1 - Shern, Ham, and Japheth, - - who was their 
father? The difficulty is not mathematical, but syntactical, which is due to the fact that in the 
statement of the problem and in the question there is not one and the same subject; but when to 
the syntactical difficulty there is added the awkwardness of the proposer of the problems in 
expressing himself in Russian, the matter becomes of greater difficulty still to the pupil; but the 
trouble is no longer mathematical. 

Let anybody understand at once Mr. Evtushevski's problem: "A certain boy had four nuts, 
another had five. The second boy gave all his nuts to the first, and this one gave three nuts to a 
third, and the rest he distributed equally to three other friends. How many nuts did each of the 
last get?" Express the problem as follows: "A boy had four nuts. He was given five more. He 
gave away three nuts, and the rest he wants to give to three friends. How many can he give to 
each?" and a child of five years of age will solve it. There is no problem here at all, but the 
difficulty may arise only from a wrong statement of the problem, or from a weak memory. And 
it is this syntactical difficulty, which the children overcome by long and difficult exercises, that 
gives the teacher cause to think that, teaching the children what they know already, he is teaching 
them anything at all. Just as arbitrarily are the children taught combinations in arithmetic and the 
decomposition of numbers according to a certain method and order, which have their foundation 
only in the fancy of the teacher. Mr. Evtushevski says: 

"Four. (1) The formation of the number. On the upper border of the board the teacher places 
three cubes together -I I I. How many cubes are there here? Then a fourth cube is added. And 
how many are there now? 1 1 1 1. How are four cubes formed from three and one? We have to add 
one cube to the three. 

"(2) Decomposition into component parts. How can four cubes be formed? or, How can four 
cubes be broken up? Four cubes may be broken up into two and two: 1 1 + 1 1. Four cubes may be 
formed from one, and one, and one, and one more, or by taking four times one cube: I + I + I + I. 
Four cubes may be broken up into three and one: 1 1 1 + I. It may be formed from one, and one, 
and two: I + I + I I. Can four cubes be put together in any other way? The pupils convince 
themselves that there can be no other decomposition, distinct from those already given. If the 


1 The Russian way of saying " Noah had three sons." 


8 



pupils begin to break the four cubes in this way: one, two, and one, or, two, one and one; or, one 
and three, the teacher will easily point out to them that these decompositions are only repetitions 
of what has been got before, only in a different order. 

"Every time, whenever the pupils indicate a new method of decomposition, the teacher places the 
cubes on a ledge of the blackboard in the manner here indicated. Thus there will be four cubes on 
the upper ledge; two and two in a second place; in a third place the four cubes will be separated 
at some distance from each other; in a fourth place, three and one, and in a fifth one, one, and 
two. 

"(3) Decomposition in order. It may easily happen that the children will at once point out the 
decomposition of the number into component parts in order; even then the third exercise cannot 
be regarded as superfluous: Here we have formed four cubes of twos, of separate cubes, and of 
threes, — in what order had we best place the cubes on the board? With what shall the 
decomposition of the four cubes begin? With the decomposition into separate cubes. How are 
four cubes to be formed from separate cubes? We must take four times one cube. How are four 
cubes to be formed from twos, from a pair? We must take two twos, twice two cubes, two pairs 
of cubes. How shall we afterward break up the four cubes? They can be formed of threes: for this 
purpose we take three and one, or one and three. The teacher explains to the pupils that the last 
decomposition, that is, 112, does not come under the accepted order, and is a modification of one 
of the first three." 

Why does Mr. Evtushevski not admit this last decomposition? Why must there be the order 
indicated by him? All that is a matter of mere arbitrariness and fancy. In reality, it is apparent to 
every thinking man that there is only one foundation for any composition and decomposition, 
and for the whole of mathematics. Here is the foundation: 1 + 1 = 2, 2 + 1 = 3, 3 + 1=4, and so 
forth, precisely what the children learn at home, and what in common parlance is called counting 
to ten, to twenty, and so forth. This process is known to every pupil, and no matter what 
decomposition Mr. Evtushevski may make, it is to be explained from this one. A boy that can 
count to four, considers four as a whole, and so also three, and two, and one. Consequently, he 
knows that four was produced from the consecutive addition of one. Similarly he knows that four 
is produced by adding twice one to two, just as he knows twice one is two. What, then, are the 
children taught here? That which they know, or that process of counting which they must learn 
according to the teacher's fancy. 

The other day I happened to witness a lesson in mathematics according to Grube's method. The 
pupil was asked: "How much is 8 and 7?" He hastened to answer and said 16. His neighbour, 
too, was in a hurry and, without raising his left hand, said: "8 and 8 is 16, and one less is 15." 
The teacher sternly stopped him, and compelled the first boy to add one after one to 8, until he 
came to 15, though the boy knew long ago that he had made a blunder. In that school they had 
reached the number 15, but 16 was supposed to be unknown yet. 

I am afraid that many people, reading all these long refutals of the methods of object instruction 
and counting according to Grube, which I am making, will say: "What is there here to talk about? 
Is it not evident that it is all mere nonsense which it is not worth while to criticize? Why pick out 


9 



the errors and blunders of a Bunakov and Evtushevski, and criticize what is beneath all 
criticism?" 

That was the way I myself thought before I was led to see what was going on in the pedagogical 
world, when I convinced myself that Messrs. Bunakov and Evtushevski were not mere 
individuals, but authorities in our pedagogics, and that what they prescribe is actually carried out 
in our schools. In the backwoods we may find teachers, especially women, who spread 
Evtushevski’ s and Bunakov's manuals out before them and ask according to their prescription 
how much one feather and one feather is, and what a hen is covered with. All that would be 
funny if it were only an invention of the theorist, and not a guide in practical work, a guide that 
some follow already, and if it did not concern one of the most important affairs of life, the 
education of the children. I was amused at it when I read it as theoretical fancies; but when I 
learned and saw that that was being practiced on children, I felt pity for them and ashamed. 

From a theoretical standpoint, not to mention the fact that they faultily define the aim of 
education, the pedagogues of this school make this essential error, that they depart from the 
conditions of all instruction, whether this instruction be on the highest or lowest stage of the 
science, in a university or in a popular school. The essential conditions of all instruction consist 
in selecting the homogeneous phenomena from an endless number of heterogeneous phenomena, 
and in imparting the laws of these phenomena to the students. Thus, in the study of language, the 
pupils are taught the laws of the word, and in mathematics, the laws of the numbers. The study of 
language consists in imparting the laws of the decomposition and of the reverse composition of 
sentences, words, syllables, sounds, and these laws form the subject of instruction. The 
instruction of mathematics consists in imparting the laws of the composition and decomposition 
of the numbers (but I beg to observe, — not in the process of the composition and the 
decomposition of the numbers, but in imparting the laws of that composition and 
decomposition). Thus, the first law consists in the ability of regarding a collection of units as a 
unit of a higher order, precisely what a child does when he says: "2 and 1 = 3." He regards 2 as a 
kind of unit. On this law are based the consequent laws of numeration, then of addition, and of 
the whole of mathematics. But arbitrary conversations about the wasp, and so forth, or problems 
within the limit of 10, -its decomposition in every manner possible, — cannot form a subject of 
instruction, because, in the first place, they transcend the subject and, in the second place, 
because they do not treat of its laws. 

That is the way the matter presents itself to me from its theoretical side; but theoretical criticism 

may frequently err, and so I will try to verify my deductions by means of practical data. G 

P has given us a sample of the practical results of both object instruction and of mathematics 

according to Grube's method. One of the older boys was told: "Put your hand under your book!" 
in order to prove that he had been taught the conceptions of "over" and "under," and the 
intelligent boy, who, I am sure, knew what "over" and "under" was, when he was three years old, 
put his hand on the book when he was told to put it under it. I have all the time observed such 
examples, and they prove more clearly than anything else how useless, strange, and disgraceful, I 
feel like saying, this object instruction is for Russian children. A Russian child cannot and will 
not believe (he has too much respect for the teacher and for himself) that the teacher is in earnest 
when he asks him whether the ceiling is above or below, or how many legs he has. In arithmetic, 
too, we have seen that pupils who did not even know how to write the numbers and during the 


10 



whole time of the instruction w r ere exercised only in mental calculations up to 10, for half an 
hour did not stop blundering in every imaginable way in response to questions which the teacher 
put to them within the limit of 10. Evidently the instruction of mental calculation brought no 
results, and the syntactical difficulty, which consists in unravelling a question that is improperly 
put, has remained the same as ever. And thus, the practical results of the examination which took 
place did not confirm the usefulness of the development. 

But I will be more exact and conscientious. Maybe the process of development, which at first is 
confined not so much to the study, as to the analysis of what the pupils know already, will 
produce results later on. Maybe the teacher, who at first takes possession of the pupils' minds by 
means of the analysis, later guides them firmly and with ease, and from the narrow sphere of the 
descriptions of a table and the count of 2 and 1 leads them into the real sphere of knowledge, in 
which the pupils are no longer confined to learning what they knew already, but also learn 
something new, and learn that new information in a new, more convenient, more intelligent 
manner. This supposition is confirmed by the fact that all the German pedagogues and their 
followers, among them Mr. Bunakov, say distinctly that object instruction is to serve as an 
introduction to "home science" and "natural science." But we should be looking in vain in Mr. 
Bunakov's manual to find out how this "home science" is to be taught, if by this word any real 
information is to be understood, and not the descriptions of a hut and a vestibule, which the 
children know already. Mr. Bunakov, on page 200, after having explained that it is necessary to 
teach where the ceiling is and where the stove, says briefly: 

"Now it is necessary to pass over to the third stage of object instruction, the contents of which 
have been defined by me as follows: The study of the country, county, Government, the whole 
realm with its natural products and its inhabitants, in general outline, as a sketch of home science 
and the beginning of natural science, with the predominance of reading, which, resting on the 
immediate observations of the first two grades, broadens the mental horizon of the pupils, —the 
sphere of their concepts and ideas. We can see from the mere definition that here the objectivity 
appears as a complement to the explanatory reading and narrative of the teacher, — consequently, 
what is said in regard to the occupations of the third year has more reference to the discussion of 
the second occupation, which enters into the composition of the subject under instruction, which 
is called the native language, the explanatory reading." 

We turn to the third year, the explanatory reading, but there we find absolutely nothing to 
indicate how the new information is to be imparted, except that it is good to read such and such 
books, and in reading to put such and such questions. The questions are extremely queer (to me, 
at least), as, for example, the comparison of the article on water by Ushinski and of the article on 
water by Aksakov, and the request made of the pupils that they should explain that Aksakov 
considers water as a phenomenon of Nature, while Ushinski considers it as a substance, and so 
forth. Consequently, we find here again the same foisting of views on the pupils, and of 
subdivisions (generally incorrect) of the teacher, and not one word, not one hint, as to how any 
new knowledge is to be imparted. 

It is not known what shall be taught: natural history, or geography. There is nothing there but 
reading with questions of the character I have just mentioned. On the other side of the instruction 
about the word, grammar and orthography, — we should just as much be looking in vain for any 


11 



new method of instruction which is based on the preceding development. Again the old 
Perevlevski's grammar, which begins with philosophical definitions and then with syntactical 
analysis, serves as the basis of all new grammatical exercises and of Mr. Bunakov's manual. 

In mathematics, too, we should be looking in vain, at that stage where the real instruction in 
mathematics begins, for anything new and more easy, based on the whole previous instruction of 
the exercises of the second year up to 20. Where in arithmetic the real difficulties are met with, 
where it becomes necessary to explain the subject from all its sides to the pupil, as in 
numeration, in addition, subtraction, division, in the division and multiplication of fractions, you 
will not find even a shadow of anything easier, any new explanation, but only quotations from 
old arithmetics. 

The character of this instruction is everywhere one and the same. The whole attention is directed 
toward teaching the pupil what he already knows. And since the pupil knows what he is being 
taught, and easily recites in any order desired what he is asked to recite by the teacher, the 
teacher thinks that he is really teaching something, and the pupil's progress is great, and the 
teacher, paying no attention to what forms the real difficulty of teaching, that is, to teaching 
something new, most comfortably stumps about in one spot. 

This explains why our pedagogical literature is overwhelmed with manuals for object-lessons, 
with manuals about how to conduct kindergartens (one of the most monstrous excrescences of 
the new pedagogy), with pictures and books for reading, in which are eternally repeated the same 
articles about the fox and the blackcock, the same poems which for some reason are written out 
in prose in all kinds of permutations and with all kinds of explanations; but we have not a single 
new article for children's reading, not one Russian, nor Church-Slavic grammar, nor a Church- 
Slavic dictionary, nor an arithmetic, nor a geography, nor a history for the popular schools. All 
the forces are absorbed in writing text-books for the instruction of children in subjects they need 
not and ought not to be taught in school, because they are taught them in life. Of course, there is 
no end to the writing of such books; for there can be only one grammar and arithmetic, but of 
exercises and reflections, like those I have quoted from Bunakov, and of the orders of the 
decomposition of numbers from Evtushevski, there may be an endless number. 

Pedagogy is in the same condition in which a science would be that would teach how a man 
ought to walk; and people would try to discover rules about how to teach the children, how to 
enjoin them to contract this muscle, stretch that muscle, and so forth. This condition of the new 
pedagogy results directly from its two fundamental principles: (1) that the aim of the school is 
development and not science, and (2) that development and the means for attaining it may be 
theoretically denned. From this has consistently resulted that miserable and frequently ridiculous 
condition in which the whole matter of the schools now is. Forces are wasted in vain, and the 
masses, who at the present moment are thirsting for education, as the dried-up grass thirsts for 
rain, and are ready to receive it, and beg for it, — instead of a loaf receive a stone, and are 
perplexed to understand whether they were mistaken in regarding education as something good, 
or whether something is wrong in what is being offered to them. That matters are really so there 
cannot be the least doubt for any man who becomes acquainted with the present theory of 
teaching and knows the actual condition of the school among the masses. Involuntarily there 
arises the question : how could honest, cultured people, who sincerely love their work and wish 


12 



to do good, — for such I regard the majority of my opponents to be, — have arrived at such a 
strange condition and be in such deep error? 

This question has interested me, and I will try to communicate those answers which have 
occurred to me. Many causes have led to it. The most natural cause which has led pedagogy to 
the false path on which it now stands, is the criticism of the old order, the criticism for the sake 
of criticism, without positing new principles in the place of those criticized. Everybody knows 
that criticizing is an easy business, and that it is quite fmitless and frequently harmful, if by the 
side of what is condemned one does not point out the principles on the basis of which this 
condemnation is uttered. If I say that such and such a thing is bad because I do not like it, or 
because everybody says that it is bad, or even because it is really bad, but do not know how it 
ought to be right, the criticism will always be useless and injurious. The views of the pedagogues 
of the new school are, above all, based on the criticism of previous methods. Even now, when it 
seems there would be no sense in striking a prostrate person, we read and hear in every manual, 
in every discussion, "that it is injurious to read without comprehension; that it is impossible to 
learn by heart the definitions of numbers and operations with numbers; that senseless 
memorizing is injurious; that it is injurious to operate with thousands without being able to count 
2 - 3," and so forth. The chief point of departure is the criticism of the old methods and the 
concoction of new ones to be as diametrically opposed to the old as possible, but by no means 
the positing of new foundations of pedagogy, from which new methods might result. 

It is very easy to criticize the old-fashioned method of studying reading by means of learning by 
heart whole pages of the psalter, and of studying arithmetic by memorizing what a number is, 
and so forth. I will remark, in the first place, that nowadays there is no need of attacking these 
methods, because there will hardly be found any teachers who would defend them, and, in the 
second place, that if, criticizing such phenomena, they want to let it be known that I am a 
defender of the antiquated method of instruction, it is no doubt due to the fact that my opponents, 
in their youth, do not know that nearly twenty years ago I with all my might and main fought 
against those antiquated methods of pedagogy and cooperated in their abolition. 

And thus it was found that the old methods of instruction were not good for anything, and, 
without building any new foundation, they began to look for new methods. I say "without 
building any new foundation," because there are only two permanent foundations of pedagogy: 
(1) The determination of the criterion of what ought to be taught, and (2) the criterion of how it 
has to be taught, that is, the determination that the chosen subjects are most necessary, and that 
the chosen method is the best. 

Nobody has even paid any attention to these foundations, and each school has in its own 
justification invented quasi-philosophical justificatory reflections. But this "theoretical 
substratum," as Mr. Bunakov has accidentally expressed himself quite well, cannot be regarded 
as a foundation. For the old method of instruction possessed just such a theoretical substratum. 

The real, peremptory question of pedagogy, which fifteen years ago I vainly tried to put in all its 
significance, "Why ought we to know this or that, and how shall we teach it?" has not even been 
touched. The result of this has been that as soon as it became apparent that the old method was 
not good, they did not try to find out what the best method would be, but immediately set out to 


13 



discover a new method which would be the very opposite of the old one. They did as a man may 
do who finds his house to be cold in winter and does not trouble himself about learning why it is 
cold, or how to help matters, but at once tries to find another house which will as little as 
possible resemble the one he is living in. I was then abroad, and I remember how I everywhere 
came across messengers roving all over Europe in search of a new faith, that is, officials of the 
ministry, studying German pedagogy. 

We have adopted the methods of instruction current with our nearest neighbours, the Germans, in 
the first place, because we are always prone to imitate the Germans; in the second, because it 
was the most complicated and cunning of methods, and if it comes to taking something from 
abroad, of course, it has to be the latest fashion and what is most cunning; in the third, because, 
in particular, these methods were more than any others opposed to the old way. And thus, the 
new methods were taken from the Germans, and not by themselves, but with a theoretical 
substratum, that is, with a quasi-philosophical justification of these methods. 

This theoretical substratum has done great service. The moment parents or simply sensible 
people, who busy themselves with the question of education, express their doubt about the 
efficacy of these methods, they are told: "And what about Pestalozzi, and Diesterweg, and 
Denzel, and Wurst, and methodics, heuristics, didactics, concentrism?" and the bold people wave 
their hands, and say: "God be with them, — they know better." In these German methods there 
also lay this other advantage (the cause why they stick so eagerly to this method), that with it the 
teacher does not need to try too much, does not need to go on studying, does not need to work 
over himself and the methods of instruction. For the greater part of the time the teacher teaches 
by this method what the children know, and, besides, teaches it from a textbook, and that is 
convenient. And unconsciously, in accordance with an innate human weakness, the teacher is 
fond of this convenience. It is very pleasant for me, with my firm conviction that I am teaching 
and doing an important and very modern work, to tell the children from the book about the 
suslik, or about a horse's having four legs, or to transpose the cubes by twos and by threes, and 
ask the children how much two and two is; but if, instead of telling about the suslik, the teacher 
had to tell or read something interesting, to give the foundations of grammar, geography, sacred 
history, and of the four operations, he would at once be led to working over himself, to reading 
much, and to refreshing his knowledge. 

Thus, the old method was criticized, and a new one was taken from the Germans. This method is 
so foreign to our Russian un-pedantic mental attitude, its monstrosity is so glaring, that one 
would think that it could never have been grafted on Russia, and yet it is being applied, even 
though only in a small measure, and in some way gives at times better results than the old church 
method. This is due to the fact that, since it was taken in our country (just as it originated in 
Germany) from the criticism of the old method, the faults of the former method have really been 
rejected, though, in its extreme opposition to the old method, which, with the pedantry 
characteristic of the Germans, has been carried to the farthest extreme, there have appeared new 
faults, which are almost greater than the former ones. 

Formerly reading was taught in Russia by attaching to the consonants useless endings ( buki -- 
uki, vyedi — yecli), and in Germany es em de ce, and so forth, by attaching a vowel to each 
consonant, now in front, and now behind, and that caused some difficulty. Now they have fallen 


14 



into the other extreme, by trying to pronounce the consonants without the vowels, which is an 
apparent impossibility. In Ushinski's grammar (Ushinski is with us the father of the sound 
method), and in all the manuals on sound, a consonant is denned thus: "That sound which cannot 
be pronounced by itself." And it is this sound which the pupil is taught before any other. When I 
remarked that it is impossible to pronounce b alone, but that it always gives you bu, I was told 
that was due to the inability of some persons, and that it took great skill to pronounce a 
consonant. And I have myself seen a teacher correct a pupil more than ten times, though he 
seemed quite satisfactorily to pronounce short b, until at last the pupil began to talk nonsense. 
And it is with these b' s, that is, sounds that cannot be pronounced, as Ushinski defines them, or 
the pronunciation of which demands special skill, that the instruction of reading begins according 
to the pedantic German manuals. 

Formerly syllables were senselessly learned by heart (that was bad); diametrically opposed to 
this, the new fashion enjoins us not to divide up into syllables at all, which is absolutely 
impossible in a long word, and which in reality is never done. Every teacher, according to the 
sound method, feels the necessity of letting a pupil rest after a part of a word, having him 
pronounce it separately. Formerly they used to read the psalter, which, on account of its high and 
deep style, is incomprehensible to the children (which was bad); in contrast to this the children 
are made to read sentences without any contents whatever, to explain intelligible words, or to 
learn by heart what they cannot understand. In the old school the teacher did not speak to the 
pupil at all; now the teacher is ordered to talk to them on anything and everything, on what they 
know already, or what they do not need to know. In mathematics they formerly learned by heart 
the definition of operations, but now they no longer have anything to do with operations, for, 
according to Evtushevski, they reach numeration only in the third year, and it is assumed that for 
a whole year they are to be taught nothing but numbers up to ten. Formerly the pupils were made 
to work with large abstract numbers, without paying any attention to the other side of 
mathematics, to the disentanglement of the problem (the formation of an equation). Now they are 
taught solving puzzles, forming equations with small numbers before they know numeration and 
how to operate with numbers, though experience teaches any teacher that the difficulty of 
forming equations or the solution of puzzles are overcome by a general development in life, and 
not in school. 

It has been observed quite correctly that there is no greater aid for a pupil, when he is puzzled by 
a problem with large numbers, than to give him the same problem with smaller numbers. The 
pupil, who in life learns to grope through problems with small numbers, is conscious of the 
process of solving, and transfers this process to the problem with large numbers. Having 
observed this, the new pedagogues try to teach only the solving of puzzles with small numbers, 
that is, what cannot form the subject of instruction and is only the work of life. 

In the instruction of grammar the new school has again remained consistent with its point of 
departure, with the criticism of the old and the adoption of the diametrically opposite method. 
Formerly they used to learn by heart the definition of the parts of speech, and from etymology 
passed over to syntax; now they not only begin with syntax, but even with logic, which the 
children are supposed to acquire. According to the grammar of Mr. Bunakov, which is an 
abbreviation of Perevlevski's grammar, even with the same choice of examples, the study of 
grammar begins with syntactical analysis, which is so difficult and, I will say, so uncertain for 


15 



the Russian language, which does not fully comply with the classic forms of syntax. To sum up, 
the new school has removed certain disadvantages, of which the chief are the superfluous 
addition to the consonants and the memorizing of definitions, and in this it is superior to the old 
method, and in reading and writing sometimes gives better results; but, on the other hand, it has 
introduced new defects, which are that the contents of the reading are most senseless and that 
arithmetic is no longer taught as a study. 

In practice (I can refer in this to all the inspectors of schools, to all the members of school 
councils, who have visited the schools, and to all the teachers), in practice, in the majority of 
schools, where the German method is prescribed, this is what takes place, with rare exceptions. 

The children learn not by the sound system, but by the method of letter composition; instead of 
saying b, v, they say lu, vu, and break up the words into syllables. The object instruction is 
entirely lost sight of, arithmetic does not proceed at all, and the children have absolutely nothing 
to read. The teachers quite unconsciously depart from the theoretical demands and fall in with 
the needs of the masses. These practical results, which are repeated everywhere, should, it seems, 
prove the incorrectness of the method itself; but among the pedagogues, those that write manuals 
and prescribe rules, there exists such a complete ignorance of and aversion to the knowledge of 
the masses and their demands that the relation of reality to these methods does not in the least 
impair the progress of their business. It is hard to imagine the conception about the masses which 
exists in this world of the pedagogues, and from which result their method and all the consequent 
manner of instruction. 

Mr. Bunakov, in proof of how necessary the object instruction and development is for the 
children of a Russian school, with extraordinary naivete adduces Pestalozzi's words: "Let any 
one who has lived among the common people," he says, "contradict my words that there is 
nothing more difficult than to impart any idea to these creatures. Nobody, indeed, gainsays that. 
The Swiss pastors affirm that when the people come to them to receive instruction they do not 
understand what they are told, and the pastors do not understand what the people say to them. 
City dwellers who settle in the country are amazed at the inability of the country population to 
express themselves; years pass before the country servants learn to express themselves to their 
masters." This relation of the common people in Switzerland to the cultured class is assumed as 
the foundation for just such a relation in Russia, I regard it as superfluous to expatiate on what is 
known to everybody, that in Germany the people speak a special language, called Plattdeutsch, 
and that in the German part of Switzerland this Plattdeutsch is especially far removed from the 
German language, whereas in Russia we frequently speak a bad language, while the masses 
always speak a good Russian, and that in Russia it will be more correct to put these words of 
Pestalozzi in the mouth of peasants speaking of the teachers. A peasant and his boy will say quite 
correctly that it is very hard to understand what those creatures, meaning the teachers, say. The 
ignorance about the masses is so complete in this world of the pedagogues that they boldly say 
that to the peasant school come little savages, and therefore boldly teach them what is down and 
what up, that a blackboard is placed on a stand, and that underneath it there is a groove. They do 
not know that if the pupils asked the teacher, there would turn up very many things which the 
teacher would not know; that, for example, if you rub off the paint from the board, nearly any 
boy will tell you of what kind of wood the board is made, whether of pine, linden, or aspen, 
which the teacher cannot tell; that a boy will always tell better than the teacher about a cat or a 


16 



chicken, because he has observed them better than the teacher; that instead of the problem about 
the wagons the boy knows the problems about the crows, about the cattle, and about the geese. 
(About the crows: There flies a flock of crows, and there stand some oak-trees: if two crows 
alight on each, a crow will be lacking; if one on each, an oak-tree will be lacking. How many 
crows and how many oak trees are there? About the cattle: For one hundred roubles buy one 
hundred animals, — calves at half a rouble, cows at three roubles, and oxen at ten roubles. How 
many oxen, cows, and calves are there ?) The pedagogues of the German school do not even 
suspect that quickness of perception, that real vital development, that contempt for everything 
false, that ready ridicule of everything false, which are inherent in every Russian peasant boy, 
and only on that account so boldly (as I myself have seen), under the fire of forty pairs of 
intelligent youthful eyes, perform their tricks at the risk of ridicule. For this reason, a real 
teacher, who knows the masses, no matter how sternly he is enjoined to teach the peasant 
children what is up and what down, and that two and three is five, not one real teacher, who 
knows the pupils with whom he has to deal, will be able to do that. 

Thus, the chief causes which have led us into such error are: (1) the ignorance about the masses; 
(2) the involuntarily seductive ease of teaching the children what they already know; (3) our 
proneness to imitate the Germans, and (4) the criticism of the old, without putting down a new, 
foundation. This last cause has led the pedagogues of the new school to this, that, in spite of the 
extreme external difference of the new method from the old, it is identical with it in its 
foundation, and, consequently, in the methods of instruction and in the results. In either method 
the essential principle consists in the teacher's firm and absolute knowledge of what to teach and 
how to teach, and this knowledge of his he does not draw from the demands of the masses and 
from experience, but simply decides theoretically once for all that he must teach this or that and 
in such a way, and so he teaches. The pedagogue of the ancient school, which for briefness' sake 
I shall call the church school, knows firmly and absolutely that he must teach from the prayer 
book and the psalter by making the children learn by rote, and he admits no alterations in his 
methods; in the same manner the teacher of the new, the German, school knows firmly and 
absolutely that he must teach according to Bunakov and Evtushevski, begin with the words 
"whisker" and "wasp," ask what is up and what down, and tell about the favourite suslik, and he 
admits no alterations in his method. Both of them base their opinion on the firm conviction that 
they know the best methods. From the identity of the foundations arises also a further similarity. 
If you tell a teacher of the church reading that it takes the children a long time and causes them 
difficulty to acquire reading and writing, he will reply that the main interest is not in the reading 
and writing, but in the "divine instruction," by which he means the study of the church books. 
The same you will be told by a teacher of Russian reading according to the German method. He 
will tell you (all say and write it) that the main question is not the rapidity of the acquisition of 
the art of reading, writing, and arithmetic, but in the "development." Both place the aim of 
instruction in something independent of reading, writing, and arithmetic, that is, of science, in 
something else, which is absolutely necessary. 

This similarity continues down to the minutest details. In either method all instruction previous 
to the school, all knowledge acquired outside the school, is not taken into account, — all entering 
pupils are regarded as equally ignorant, and all are made to learn from the beginning. If a boy 
who knows the letters and the syllables a, be, enters a church school, he is made to change them 
to buki-az - ba. The same is true of the German school. 


17 



Just so, in either school it happens that some children cannot learn the rudiments. 

Just so, with either method, the mechanical side of instruction predominates over the mental. In 
either school the pupils excel in a good handwriting and good enunciation with absolutely exact 
reading, that is, not as it is spoken, but as it is written. Just so, with either method, there always 
reigns an external order in the school, and the children are in constant fear and can be guided 
only with the greatest severity. Mr. Korolev has incidentally remarked that in instruction 
according to the sound method blows are not neglected. I have seen the same in the schools of 
the German method, and I assume that without blows it is impossible to get along even in the 
new German school, because, like the church school, it teaches without asking what the pupil 
finds interesting to know, but what, in the teacher's opinion, seems necessary, and so the school 
can be based only on compulsion. Compulsion is attained with children generally by means of 
blows. The church and the new German school, starting from the same principles and arriving at 
the same, results, are absolutely identical. But, if it came to choosing one of the two, I should 
still prefer the church school. The defects are the same, but on the side of the church school is the 
custom of a thousand years and the authority of the church, which is so powerful with the 
masses. 

Having finished the analysis and criticism of the German school, I consider it necessary, in view 
of what I have said, namely, that criticism is fruitful only when, condemning, it points out how 
that which is bad ought to be, — I consider it necessary to speak of those foundations of 
instruction which I regard as legitimate, and on which I rear my method of instruction. 

In order to elucidate in what I find these unquestionable foundations of every pedagogical 
activity, I shall be compelled to repeat myself, that is, to repeat what I said fifteen years ago in 
the pedagogical periodical, Yasnaya Polyana, which I then published. This repetition will not be 
tedious for the pedagogues of the new school, because what I then wrote is not exactly forgotten, 
but has never been considered by the pedagogues, — and yet I still think that just what was 
expressed by me at that time might have placed pedagogy, as a theory, on a firm foundation. 
Fifteen years ago, when I took up the matter of popular education without any preconceived 
theories or views on the subject, with the one desire to advance the matter in a direct and 
straightforward manner, I, as a teacher in my school, was at once confronted with two questions: 
(1) What must I teach? and (2) How must I teach it? 

At that time, even as at the present, there existed the greatest diversity of opinion in the answers 
to these questions. 

I know that some pedagogues, who are locked up in their narrow theoretical world, think that 
there is no other light than what peeps through the windows, and that there is no longer any 
diversity of opinions. 

I ask those who think so to observe that it only seems so to them, just as it seems so to the circles 
that are opposed to them. In the whole mass of people who are interested in education, there 
exists, as it has existed before, the greatest diversity of opinions. Formerly, just as now, some, in 
reply to the question of what ought to be taught, said that outside of the rudiments the most 


18 



useful information for a primary school is obtained from the natural sciences ; others, even as 
now, that that was not necessary, and was even injurious; even as now, some proposed history, or 
geography, while others denied their necessity; some proposed the Church-Slavic language and 
grammar, and religion, while others found that, too, superfluous, and ascribed a prime 
importance to "development." On the question of how to teach there has always been a still 
greater diversity of answers. The most diversified methods of instructing in reading and 
arithmetic have been proposed. 

In the bookstalls there were sold, side by side, the self teachers according to the buki-az — ba, 
Bunakov's lessons, Zolotov's charts, Madame Daragan's alphabets, and all had their advocates. 
When I encountered these questions and found no answer for them in Russian literature, I turned 
to the literature of Europe. After having read what had been written on the subject and having 
made the personal acquaintance of the so-called best representatives of the pedagogical science 
in Europe, I not only failed to find anywhere an answer to the question I was interested in, but I 
convinced myself that this question does not even exist for pedagogy, as a science; that every 
pedagogue of any given school firmly believed that the methods which he used were the best, 
because they were based on absolute truth, and that it would be useless for him to look at them 
with a critical eye. 

However, because, as I said, I took up the matter of popular education without any preconceived 
notions, or because I took up the matter without prescribing laws from a distance about how I 
ought to teach, but became a schoolmaster in a village popular school in the backwoods, I could 
not reject the idea that there must of necessity exist a criterion by means of which the question 
could be solved: What to teach and how to teach it. Should I teach the psalter by heart, or the 
classification of the organisms? Should I teach according to the sound alphabet, translated from 
the German, or from the prayer-book? In the solution of this question I was aided by a certain 
pedagogical tact, with which I am gifted, and especially by that close and impassioned relation 
in which I stood to the matter. 

When I entered at once into the closest direct relations with those forty tiny peasants that formed 
my school (I call them tiny peasants because I found in them the same characteristics of 
perspicacity, the same immense store of information from practical life, of jocularity, simplicity, 
and loathing for everything false, which distinguish the Russian peasant), when I saw that 
susceptibility, that readiness to acquire the information which they needed, I felt at once that the 
antiquated church method of instruction had outlived its usefulness and was not good for them. I 
began to experiment on other proposed methods of instruction; but, because compulsion in 
education, both by my conviction and by my character, are repulsive to me, I did not exercise 
any pressure, and, the moment I noticed that something was not readily received, I did not 
compel them, and looked for something else. From these experiments it appeared to me and to 
those teachers who instructed with me at Yasnaya Polyana and in other schools on the same 
principle of freedom, that nearly everything which in the pedagogical world was written about 
schools was separated by an immeasurable abyss from reality, and that many of the proposed 
methods, such as object-lessons, the natural sciences, the sound method, and others, called forth 
contempt and ridicule, and were not accepted by the pupils. We began to look for those contents 
and those methods which were readily taken up by the pupils, and struck that which forms my 
method of instruction. 


19 



But this method stood in a line with all other methods, and the question of why it was better than 
the rest remained as unsolved as before. Consequently, the question of what the criterion was as 
to what to teach and how to teach received an even greater meaning for me; only by solving it 
could I be convinced that what I taught was neither injurious nor useless. This question both then 
and now has appeared to me as a comer-stone of the whole pedagogy, and to the solution of this 
question I devoted the publication of the pedagogical periodical Yasnaya Polyana. In several 
articles (I do not renounce anything I then said) I tried to put the question in all its significance 
and to solve it as much as I could. At that time I found no sympathy in all the pedagogical 
literature, not even any contradiction, but the most complete indifference to the question which I 
put. There were some attacks on certain details and trifles, but the question itself evidently did 
not interest any one. I was young then, and that indifference grieved me. I did not understand that 
with my question, "How do you know what to teach and how to teach?" I was like a man who, 
let us say, in a gathering of Turkish pashas discussing the question in what manner they may 
collect the greatest revenue from the people, should propose to them the following: "Gentlemen, 
in order to know how much revenue to collect from each, we must first analyze the question on 
what your right to exact that revenue is based." Obviously all the pashas would continue their 
discussion of the measures of extortion, and would reply only with silence to his irrelevant 
question. But the question cannot be circumvented. Fifteen years ago no attention was paid to it, 
and the pedagogues of every school, convinced that everybody else was talking to the wind and 
that they were right, most calmly prescribed their laws, basing their principles on philosophies of 
a very doubtful character, which they used as a substratum for their wee little theories. 

And yet, this question is not quite so difficult if we only renounce completely all preconceived 
notions. I have tried to elucidate and solve this question, and, without repeating those proofs, 
which he who wishes may read in the article, I will enunciate the results to which I was led. "The 
only criterion of pedagogy is freedom, the only method — experience." After fifteen years I have 
not changed my opinion one hair's breadth; but I consider it necessary to define with greater 
precision what I understand by these words, not only in respect to education in general, but also 
in respect to the particular question of popular education in a primary school. One hundred years 
ago the question what to teach and how to teach could have had no place either in Europe or with 
us. Education was inseparably connected with religion. To leam reading meant to learn Holy 
Writ. In the Mohammedan countries this relation of the rudiments and religion still persists in its 
full force. To leam means to leam the Koran, and, therefore, Arabic. But the moment religion 
ceased to be the criterion of what ought to be taught, and the school became independent of it, 
this question had to arise. But it did not arise because the school was not suddenly freed from its 
dependence on religion, but by imperceptible steps. Now it is accepted by everybody that 
religion cannot serve as the contents, nor as an indication of the method of education, and that 
education has different demands for its basis. In what do these demands consist? On what are 
they based? In order that these principles should be incontrovertible, it is necessary either that 
they be proved philosophically, incontrovertibly, or that, at least, all educated people should be 
agreed on them. But is it so? There can be no doubt whatsoever about this, that in philosophy 
have not been found those principles on which could be built up the decision of what ought to be 
taught, the more so since the matter itself is not an abstract, but a practical affair, which depends 
on an endless number of vital conditions. Still less can these principles be discovered in the 
common consent of all men who busy themselves with this matter, in the consent which we may 


20 



take as a practical foundation, as an expression of the universal common sense. Not only in 
matters of popular, but even of higher education do we see a complete diversity of opinions 
among the best representatives of education, as, for example, in the question of classicism and 
realism. And yet, in spite of the absence of any foundations, we see education proceeding on its 
own path and on the whole being guided by only one principle, namely by freedom. There exist 
side by side the classical and the real school, each of which is prepared to regard itself as the 
only natural school, and both satisfy some want, for parents send their children to either. 

In the popular school the right to determine what the children shall learn, no matter from what 
standpoint we may consider this question, belongs just as much to the masses, that is, either to 
the pupils themselves, or to the parents who send the children to school, and so the answer to the 
question what the children are to be taught in a popular school can be got only from the masses. 
But, perhaps, we shall say that we, as highly cultured people, must not submit to the demands of 
the rude masses and that we must teach the masses what to wish. Thus many think, but to that I 
can give this one answer: give us a firm, incontrovertible foundation why this or that is chosen 
by you, show me a society in which the two diametrically opposed views on education do not 
exist among the highly cultured people; where it is not eternally repeated that if education falls 
into the hands of the clergy, the masses are educated in one sense, and if education falls into the 
hands of the progressists, the people are educated in another sense, — show me a state of society 
where that does not exist, and I will agree with you. So long as that does not exist, there is no 
criterion except the freedom of the learner, where, in matters of the popular school, the place of 
the learning children is taken by their parents, that is, by the needs of the masses. 

These needs are not only definite, quite clear, and everywhere the same throughout Russia, but 
also so intelligent and broad that they include all the most diversified demands of the people who 
are debating what the masses ought to be taught. These needs are: the knowledge of Russian and 
Church-Slavic reading, and calculation. The masses everywhere and always regard the natural 
sciences as useless trifles. Their programme is remarkable not only by its unanimity and firm 
definiteness, but, in my opinion, also by the breadth of its demands and the correctness of its 
view. The masses admit two spheres of knowledge, the most exact and the least subject to 
vacillation from a diversity of views, - the languages and mathematics; everything else they 
regard as trifles. I think that the masses are quite correct, in the first place, because in this 
knowledge there can be no half information, no falseness, which they cannot bear, and, in the 
second, because the sphere of those two kinds of knowledge is immense. Russian and Church- 
Slavic grammar and calculation, that is, the knowledge of one dead and one living language, with 
their etymological and syntactical forms and their literatures, and arithmetic, that is, the 
foundation of all mathematics, form their programme of knowledge, which, unfortunately, but 
the rarest of the cultured class possess. In the third place, the masses are right, because by this 
programme they will be taught in the primary school only what will open to them the more 
advanced paths of knowledge, for it is evident that the thorough knowledge of two languages and 
their forms, and, in addition to them, of arithmetic, completely opens the paths to an independent 
acquisition of all other knowledge. The masses, as though feeling the false relation to them, 
when they are offered incoherent scraps of all kinds of information, repel that lie from 
themselves, and say: "I need know but this much, — the church language and my own and the 
laws of the numbers, but that other knowledge I will take myself if I want it." 


21 



Thus, if we admit freedom as the criterion of what is to be taught, the programme of the popular 
schools is clearly and firmly defined, until the time when the masses shall express some new 
demands. Church-Slavic and Russian and arithmetic to their highest possible stages, and nothing 
else but that. That is the determination of the limits of the programme of the popular school, 
which, however, does not presume that all three subjects be introduced systematically. With such 
a programme the attainment of symmetrical results in all three subjects would naturally be 
desirable; but it cannot be said that the predominance of one subject over another would be 
injurious. The problem consists only in keeping within the limits of the programme. It may 
happen that from the demands of the parents, and especially from the knowledge of the teacher, 
this or that subject will be more prominent, — with a clerical person the Church-Slavic language, 
with a teacher from a county school either Russian or arithmetic; in all these cases the demands 
of the masses will be satisfied, and the instruction will not depart from its fundamental criterion. 

The second part of the question, how to teach, that is, how to discover which method is the best, 
has remained just as unsolved. 

Just as in the first part of the question of what to teach, the assumption that on the basis of 
reflections it is possible to build a programme of instruction leads to contradictory schools, so it 
is also with the question as to how to teach. Let us take the very first stage of the teaching of 
reading. One asserts that it is easier to teach so from cards; another according to the b, v system; 
a third according to Korf; a fourth according to the be, ve, ge system, and so forth. It is said that 
the nuns teach reading in six weeks by the buki-az -- ba system. And every teacher, convinced of 
the superiority of his method, proves this superiority either by the fact that he teaches with it 
faster than others, or by reflections of the character which Mr. Bunakov and the German 
pedagogues adduce. At the present time, when there are thousands of examples, we ought to 
know precisely by what to be guided in our choice. Neither theory, nor reflections, nor even the 
results of instruction can show this completely. 

Education and instruction are generally considered in the abstract, that is, the question is 
discussed how in the best and easiest manner to produce a certain act of instruction on a certain 
subject (whether it be one child or a mass of children). This view is quite faulty. All education 
and instruction can be viewed only as a certain relation of two persons or of two groups of 
persons having for their aim education or instruction. This definition, more general than all the 
other definitions, has special reference to popular education, where the question is the education 
of an immense number of persons, and where there can be no question about an ideal education. 
In general, with the popular education we cannot put the question, "How is the best education to 
be given?" just as with the question of the nutrition of the masses we cannot ask how the most 
nutritious and best loaf is to be baked. The question has to be put like this: "How is the best 
relation to be established between given people who want to learn and others who want to 
teach?" or, "How is the best bread to be made from given bolted flour?" Consequently the 
question of how to teach and what is the best method is a question of what will be the best 
relation between teacher and pupil. 

Nobody, I suppose, will deny that the best relation between teacher and pupil is that of 
naturalness, and that the contrary relation is that of compulsion. If so, the measure of all methods 
is to be found in the greater or lesser naturalness of relations and, therefore, in the lesser or 


22 



greater compulsion in instruction. The less the children are compelled to learn, the better is the 
method; the more — the worse. I am glad that I do not have to prove this evident truth. 
Everybody is agreed that just as in hygiene the use of any food, medicine, exercise, that provokes 
loathing or pain, cannot be useful, so also in instruction can there be no necessity of compelling 
children to learn anything that is tiresome and repulsive to them, and that, if necessity demands 
that children be compelled, it only proves the imperfection of the method. Any one who has 
taught children has no doubt observed that the less the teacher himself knows the subject which 
he teaches and the less he likes it, the more will he have to have recourse to severity and 
compulsion; on the contrary, the more the teacher knows and loves his subject, the more natural 
and easy will his instruction be. With the idea that for successful instruction not compulsion is 
wanted, but the rousing of the pupil's interest, all the pedagogues of the school which is opposed 
to me agree. The only difference between us is that the conception that the teaching must rouse 
the child's interest is with them lost in a mass of other conflicting notions about "development," 
of the value of which they are convinced and in which they exercise compulsion; whereas I 
consider the rousing of the pupil's interest, the greatest possible ease, and, therefore, the non- 
compulsion and naturalness of instruction as the fundamental and only measure of good and bad 
instruction. 

Every progress of pedagogy, if we attentively consider the history of this matter, consists in an 
ever increasing approximation toward naturalness of relations between teacher and pupil, in a 
lessened compulsion, and in a greater ease of instruction. 

The objection was formerly made and, I know, is made even now that it is hard to find the limit 
of freedom which shall be permitted in school. To this I will reply that this limit is naturally 
determined by the teacher, his knowledge, his ability to manage the school; that this freedom 
cannot be prescribed; the measure of this freedom is only the result of the greater or lesser 
knowledge and talent of the teacher. This freedom is not a rule, but serves as a check in 
comparing schools between themselves, and as a check in comparing new methods which are 
introduced into the school curriculum. The school in which there is less compulsion is better than 
the one in which there is more. The method which at its introduction into the school does not 
demand an increase of discipline is good; but the one which demands greater severity is certainly 
bad. Take, for example, a more or less free school, such as mine was, and try to start a 
conversation in it about the table and the ceiling, or to transpose cubes, you will see what a 
hubbub will arise in the school and how you will feel the necessity of restoring order by means 
of severity; try to tell them an interesting story, or to give them problems, or make one write on 
the board and let the others correct his mistakes, and allow them to leave the benches, and you 
will find them all occupied and there will be no naughtiness, and you will not have to increase 
your severity, and you may safely say that the method is good. 

In my pedagogical articles I have given theoretical reasons why I find that only the freedom of 
choice on the side of the learners as to what they are to be taught and how can form a foundation 
of any instruction; in practice I have always applied these rules in the schools under my 
guidance, at first on a large scale, and later in narrower limits, and the results have always been 
very good, both for the teachers and the pupils, as also for the evolution of new methods, - - and 
this I assert boldly, for hundreds of visitors have come to the Yasnaya Polyana school and know 
all about it. 


23 



The consequences of such a relation to the pupils has been for the teachers that they did not 
consider that method best which they knew, but tried to discover other methods, became 
acquainted with other teachers for the purpose of learning their methods, tested new methods, 
and, above all, were learning something all the time. A teacher never permitted himself to think 
that in cases of failure it was the pupils' fault, — their laziness, playfulness, dullness, deafness, 
stammering, — but was firmly convinced that he alone was to blame for it, and for every failure 
of a pupil or of all the pupils he tried to find a remedy. For the pupils the result was that they 
learned readily, always begged the teachers to give them evening classes in the winter, and were 
absolutely free in the school, — which, in my conviction and experience, is the chief condition 
for successful progress in instruction. Between teachers and pupils there were always established 
friendly, natural relations, with which alone it is possible for the teacher to know his pupils well. 
If, from a first, external impression of the school, we were to determine the difference between 
the church, the German, and my own school, it would be this: in a church school you hear a 
peculiar, unnatural, monotonous shouting of all the pupils and now and then the stem cries of the 
teacher; in the German school you hear only the teacher's voice and now and then the timid 
voices of the pupils; in mine you hear the loud voices of the teachers and the pupils, almost 
simultaneously. 

As for the methods of instruction the consequences were that not one method of instruction was 
adopted or rejected because it was liked or not, but only because it was accepted or not by the 
pupils without compulsion. But in addition to the good results which were always obtained 
without fail from the application of my method by myself and by everybody else (more than 
twenty teachers), who taught according to my method ("without fail" I say for the reason that not 
once did we have a pupil who did not learn the rudiments), besides these results, the application 
of the principles of which I have spoken had the effect that during these fifteen years all the 
various modifications, to which my method was subjected, not only did not remove it from the 
needs of the masses, but, on the contrary, brought it nearer and nearer to them. The masses, at 
least in our parts, know the method itself and discuss it, and prefer it to the church method, 
which I cannot say of the sound method. In the schools which are conducted according to my 
method the teacher cannot remain motionless in his knowledge, such as he is and must be with 
the method of sounds. If a teacher according to the new German fashion wants to go ahead and 
perfect himself, he has to follow the pedagogical literature, that is, to read all those new 
inventions about the conversations about the suslik and about the transposition of the squares. I 
do not think that that can promote his personal education. On the contrary, in my school, where 
the subjects of instruction, language and mathematics, demand positive knowledge, every 
teacher, in advancing his pupils, feels the need of learning himself, which was constantly the 
case with all the teachers I had. 

Besides, the methods of instruction themselves, which are not settled once for all, but always 
strive to be as easy and as simple as possible, are modified and improved from the indications 
which the teacher discovers in the relations of the learners to his instruction. 

The very opposite to this I see in what, unfortunately, takes place in the schools of the German 
pattern, which of late have been introduced in our country in an artificial manner. The failure to 
recognize that before deciding what to teach and how to teach we must solve the question how 


24 



we can find that out has led the pedagogues to a complete disagreement with reality, and the 
abyss which fifteen years ago was felt to exist between theory and practice has now reached the 
farthest limits. Now that the masses are on all sides begging for education, while pedagogy has 
more than ever passed to personal fancies, this discord has reached incredible proportions. 

This discord between the demands of pedagogy and reality has of late found its peculiarly 
striking expression not only in the matter of instruction itself, but also in another very important 
side of the school, namely in its administration. In order to show in what condition this matter 
has been and might be, I shall speak of Krapivensk County of the Government of Tula, in which 
I live, which I know, and which, from its position, forms the type of the majority of counties of 
central Russia. 

In 1862 fourteen schools were opened in a district of ten thousand souls, when I was rural judge; 
besides, there existed about ten schools in the district among the clericals and in the manors 
among the servants. In the three remaining districts of the county there were fifteen large and 
thirty small schools among the clericals and manorial servants. Without saying anything about 
the number of the learners, of which, I assume, there were in general not less than now, nor about 
the instruction itself, which was partly bad and partly good, but on the whole not worse than at 
present, I will tell how and on what that business was based. 

All schools were then, with few exceptions, based on a free agreement of the teacher with the 
parents of the pupils, or with the whole partnership of the peasants paying a lump sum for 
everybody. Such a relation between the parents or Communes and the teachers is even now met 
with in some exceedingly rare places of our country and of the Government in general. 
Everybody will agree that, leaving aside the question of the quality of instruction, such a relation 
of the teacher to the parents and peasants is most just, natural, and desirable. But, with the 
introduction of the law of 1864, this relation was abolished and is being abolished more and 
more. Everybody who knows the matter as it is will observe that with the abolition of this 
relation the people take less and less part in the matter of their education, which is only natural. 
In some County Councils the school tax of the peasants is even turned into the County Council, 
and the salary, appointment of teachers, location of schools, all that is done quite independently 
of those for whom it is intended (in theory the peasants, no doubt, are members of the County 
Council, but in practice they have through this mediation no influence on their own schools). 
Nobody will, I suppose, assert that that is just, but some will say: "The illiterate peasants cannot 
judge what is good and what bad, and we must build for them as well as we can." But how do we 
know? Do we know firmly, are we all of one opinion, how to build schools? And does it not 
frequently turn out bad, for we have built much worse than they have? 

Thus, in relation to the administrative side of the schools I have again to put a third question, on 
the same basis of freedom: Why do we know how best to arrange a school? To this question 
German pedagogy gives an answer which is quite consistent with its whole system. It knows 
what the best school is, it has formed a clear, definite ideal, down to the minutest details, the 
benches, the hours of instruction, and so forth, and gives an answer: the school has to be such 
and such, according to this pattern, — this alone is good and every other school is injurious. I 
know that, although the desire of Henry IV to give each Frenchman soup and a chicken was 
unrealizable, it was impossible to say that the desire was false. But the matter assumes an 


25 



entirely different aspect when the soup is of a very questionable quality and is not a chicken 
soup, but a worthless broth. And yet the so-called science of pedagogy is in this matter 
indissolubly connected with power; both in Germany and with us there are prescribed certain 
ideal one-class, two-class schools, and so forth; and the pedagogical and the administrative 
powers do not wish to know the fact that the masses would like to attend to their own education. 
Let us see how such a view of popular education has been reflected in practice on the question of 
education. 

Beginning with the year 1862 the idea that education was necessary has more and more spread 
among the masses: on all sides schools were established by church servants, hired teachers, and 
the Communes. Whether good or bad, these schools were spontaneous and grew out directly 
from the needs of the masses; with the introduction of the law of 1864 this tendency was 
increased, and in 1870 there were, according to the reports, about sixty schools in Krapivensk 
County. Since then officials of the ministry and members of the County Council have begun to 
meddle more and more with school matters, and in Krapivensk County forty schools have been 
closed and schools of a lower order have been prohibited from being opened. I know that those 
who closed those schools affirm that these schools existed only nominally and were very bad; 
but I cannot believe it, because I know well-instructed pupils from three villages, Trosna, 
Lamintsovo, and Yasnaya Polyana, where schools were closed. I also know — and this will seem 
incredible to many what is meant by prohibiting the opening of schools. It means that, on the 
basis of a circular of the ministry of public instruction, which spoke of the prohibition of 
unreliable teachers (this, no doubt, had reference to the Nihilists), the school council transferred 
this prohibition to the minor schools, taught by sextons, soldiers, and so forth, which the peasants 
themselves had opened, and which, no doubt, are not at all comprised in the circular. But, 
instead, there exist twenty schools with teachers, who are supposed to be good because they 
receive a salary of two hundred roubles in silver, and the County Council has distributed 
Ushinski's text-books, and these schools are called one-class schools, because they teach in them 
according to a programme, and the whole year around, that is, also in summer, with the 
exception of July and August. 

Leaving aside the question of the quality of the former schools, we shall now take a glance at 
their administrative side, and we will compare, from this side, what was before, with what is 
now. In the administrative, external side of the school there are five main subjects, which are so 
closely connected with the school business itself that on their good or bad structure depend to a 
great extent the success and dissemination of popular education. These five subjects are: (1) the 
school building, (2) the schedule of instruction, (3) the distribution of the schools according to 
localities, (4) the choice of the teacher, and — what is most important — (5) the material means, 
the remuneration of the teachers. 

In regard to the school building the masses rarely have any difficulty, when they start a school 
for themselves, and if the Commune is rich and there are any communal buildings, such as a 
storehouse or a deserted inn, the Commune fixes it up; if there is none, it buys a building, at 
times even from a landed proprietor, or it builds one of its own. If the Commune is not well-to- 
do and is small, it hires quarters from a peasant, or establishes a rotation, and the teacher passes 
from hut to hut. If the Commune, as it most generally does, selects a teacher from its own midst, 
a manorial servant, a soldier, or a church servant, the school is located at the house of that 


26 



person, and the Commune looks only after the heating. In any case, I have never heard that the 
question of the location of the school ever troubled a Commune, or that half the sum set aside for 
instruction should be lost, as is done by school councils, on the buildings, nay, not even one-sixth 
or one-tenth of the whole sum. The peasant Communes have arranged it one way or another, but 
the question of the school building has never been regarded as troublesome. Only under the 
influence of the higher authorities do there occur cases where the Communes build brick 
buildings with iron roofs. The peasants assume that the school is not in the structure, but in the 
teacher, and that the school is not a permanent institution, but that as soon as the parents have 
acquired knowledge, the next generation will get the rudiments without a teacher. But the County 
Council department of the ministry always assumes since for it the whole problem consists in 
inspecting and classifying — that the chief foundation of the school is the structure and that the 
school is a permanent establishment, and so, as far as I know, now spends about one-half of its 
money on buildings, and inscribes empty school buildings in the list of the schools of the third 
order. In the Krapivensk County Council seven hundred roubles out of two thousand roubles are 
spent on buildings. The ministerial department cannot admit that the teacher (that educated 
pedagogue who is assumed for the masses) would lower himself to such an extent as to be 
willing to go, like a tailor, from hut to hut, or to teach in a smoky house. But the masses assume 
nothing and only know that for their money they can hire whom they please, and that, if they, the 
hiring peasants, live in smoky huts, the hired teacher has no reason to turn up his nose at them. In 
regard to the second question, about the division of the school time, the masses have always and 
everywhere invariably expressed one demand, and that is that the instruction shall be carried on 
in the winter only. 

Everywhere the parents quit sending their children in the spring, and those children who are left 
in the school, from one-fourth to one-fifth of the whole number, are the little tots or the children 
of rich parents, and they attend school unwillingly. When the masses hire a teacher themselves, 
they always hire him by the month and only for the winter. The ministerial department assumes 
that, just as in the institutions of learning there are two months of vacation, so it ought also to be 
in a one-class country school. From the standpoint of the ministerial department that is quite 
reasonable: the children will not forget their instruction, the teacher is provided for during the 
whole year, and the inspectors find it more comfortable to travel in the summer; but the masses 
know nothing about all that, and their common sense tells them that in winter the children sleep 
for ten hours, consequently their minds are fresh; that in winter there are no plays and no work 
for the children, and that if they study in winter as long as possible, taking in even the evenings, 
for which a lamp costing one rouble fifty kopeks is needed and kerosene costing as much, there 
will be enough instruction. Besides, in the summer every boy is of use to the peasant, and in 
summer proceeds the life instruction, which is more important than school learning. The masses 
say that there is no reason why they should pay the teacher during the summer. "Rather will we 
increase his pay for the winter months, and that will please him better. We prefer to hire a 
teacher at twenty-five roubles a month for seven months, than at twelve roubles a month for the 
whole year. For the summer the teacher will hire himself out elsewhere." 

As to the third question, the distribution of the schools according to localities, the arrangements 
of the masses most markedly differ from those of the school council. In the first place, the 
distribution of the schools, that is, whether there shall be more or less of them for a certain 
locality, always depends on the character of the whole population (when the masses themselves 


27 



attend to it). Wherever the masses are more industrial and work out, where they are nearer to the 
cities, where they need the rudiments, there there are more schools; where the locality is more 
removed and agricultural, there there are fewer of them. In the second place, when the masses 
themselves attend to the matter, they distribute the schools in such a way as to give all the 
parents a chance to make use of the schools in return for their money, that is, to send their 
children to school. The peasants of small, remote villages of from thirty to forty souls, where half 
the population will be found, prefer to have a cheap teacher in their own village, than an 
expensive one in the centre of the township, whither their children cannot walk or be driven. By 
this distribution of the schools, the schools themselves, as arranged by the peasants, depart, it is 
true, from the required pattern of the school, but, instead, acquire the most diversified forms, 
everywhere adapting themselves to local conditions. Here a clerical person from a neighbouring 
village teaches eight boys at his house, receiving fifty kopeks a month from each. Here a small 
village hires a soldier for eight roubles for the winter, and he goes from house to house. Here a 
rich innkeeper hires a teacher for his children for five roubles and board, and the neighbouring 
peasants join him, by adding two roubles for each of their boys. There a large village or a 
compact township levies fifteen kopeks from each of the twelve hundred souls and hires a 
teacher for 180 roubles for the winter. There the priest teaches, receiving as a remuneration 
either money, or labour, or both. The chief difference in this respect between the view of the 
peasants and that of the County Council is this: the peasants, according to the more or less 
favourable local conditions, introduce schools of a better or worse quality, but always in such a 
way that there is not a single locality where some kind of instruction is not offered; while with 
the arrangement of the County Council a large half of the population is left outside every 
possibility of partaking of that education even in the distant future. 

In matters of the petty villages, forming one-half of the population, the ministerial department 
acts most decisively. It says: "We provide schools where there is a building and where the 
peasants of the township have collected enough money to support a teacher at two hundred 
roubles. We will contribute from the County Council what is wanting, and the school is entered 
on the lists." The villages that are removed from the school may send their children there, if they 
so wish. Of course, the peasants do not take their children there, because it is too far, and yet 
they pay. Thus, in the Yasenets township all pay for three schools, but only 450 souls in three 
villages make use of the school, though there are in all three thousand souls; thus, only one- 
seventh of the population makes use of the school, though all pay for it. In the Chermoshen 
township there are nine hundred souls and there is a school there, but only thirty pupils attend it, 
because all the villages of that township are scattered. To nine hundred souls there ought to be 
four hundred pupils. And yet, both in the Yasenets and the Chermoshen townships the question 
of the distribution of schools is regarded as satisfactorily solved. 

In matters of the choice of a teacher, the masses are again guided by quite different views from 
the County Council. In choosing a teacher, the masses look upon him in their own way, and 
judge him accordingly. If the teacher has been in the neighbourhood, and the masses know what 
the results of his teaching are, they value him according to these results as a good or as a bad 
teacher; but, in addition to the scholastic qualities, the masses demand that the teacher shall be a 
man who stands in close relations to the peasant, able to understand his life and to speak Russian, 
and so they will always prefer a country to a city teacher. In doing so, the masses have no bias 
and no antipathy toward any class in particular: he may be a gentleman, official, burgher, soldier, 


28 



sexton, priest, — that makes no difference so long as he is a simple man and a Russian. For this 
reason the peasants have no cause for excluding clerical persons, as the County Councils do. The 
County Councils select their teachers from among strangers, getting them from the cities, while 
the masses look for them among themselves. But the chief difference in this respect between the 
view of the Communes and that of the County Council consists in this: the County Council has 
only one type, the teacher who has attended pedagogical courses, who has finished a course in a 
seminary or school, at two hundred roubles; but with the masses, who do not exclude this teacher 
and appreciate him, if he is good, there are gradations of all kinds of teachers. Besides, with the 
majority of school councils there are definite favourite types of teachers, for the most part such 
as are foreign to the masses and antagonistic to them, and other types which the school councils 
dislike. Thus, evidently, the favourite type of many counties of the Government of Tula are lady 
teachers; the disliked type are the clerical persons, and in the whole of the Tula and Krapivensk 
counties there is not one school with a teacher from the clergy, which is quite remarkable from 
an administrative point of view. In Krapivensk County there are fifty parishes. The clerical 
persons are the cheapest of teachers, because they are permanently settled and for the most part 
can teach in their own houses with the aid of their wives and daughters, and these are, it seems, 
purposely avoided, as though they were very harmful people. 

In matters of the remuneration of the teachers, the difference between the view of the masses and 
that of the County Council has almost all been expressed in the preceding pages. It consists in 
this: (1) the masses choose a teacher according to their means, and they admit and know from 
experience that there are teachers at all prices, from two puds of flour a month to thirty roubles a 
month; (2) teachers are to be remunerated for the winter mouths, for those during which there 
can be some instruction; (3) the masses, in the housing of the school as also in matters of the 
remuneration of the teachers, always know how to find a cheap way: they give flour, hay, the use 
of carts, eggs, and all kinds of trifles, which are imperceptible to the world at large, but which 
improve the teacher's condition; (4) above all, a teacher is paid, or is remunerated in addition to 
the payment, by the parents of the pupils, who pay by the month, or by the whole Commune 
which enjoys the advantages of the school, and not by the administration that has no direct 
interest in the matter. 

The ministerial department cannot act differently in this respect. The norm of the salary for a 
model teacher is given, consequently these means have to be got together in some way. For 
example: a Commune intends to open a school, the township gives it a certain number of kopeks 
per soul. The County Council calculates how much to add. If there are no demands made by 
other schools, it gives more, sometimes twice as much as the Commune has given; at times, 
when all the money has been distributed, it gives less, or entirely refuses to give any. Thus, there 
is in Krapivensk County a Commune which gives ninety roubles, and the County Council adds to 
that three hundred roubles for a school with an assistant; and there is another Commune which 
gives 250 roubles, and the County Council adds another fifty roubles; and a third Commune 
which offers fifty-six roubles, and the County Council refuses to add anything or to open the 
school, because that money is insufficient for a normal school, and all the money has been 
distributed. 

Thus, the chief distinctions between the administrative view of the masses and that of the County 
Council are the following: (1) the County Council pays great attention to the housing and spends 


29 



large sums upon it, while the masses obviate this difficulty by domestic, economic means, and 
look upon the primary schools as temporary, passing institutions; (2) the ministerial department 
demands that instruction be carried on during the whole year, with the exception of July and 
August, and nowhere introduces evening classes, while the masses demand that instruction be 
carried on only in the winter and are fond of evening classes; (3) the ministerial department has a 
definite type of teachers, without which it does not recognize the school, and has a loathing for 
clerical persons and, in general, for local instructors; the masses recognize no norm and choose 
their teachers preferably from local inhabitants; (4) the ministerial department distributes the 
schools by accident, that is, it is guided only by the desire of forming a normal school, and has 
no care for that greater half of the population which under such a distribution is left outside the 
school education; the masses not only recognize no definite external form of the school, but in 
the greatest variety of ways get teachers with all kinds of means, arranging worse and cheaper 
schools with small means and good and expensive schools with greater means, and turn their 
attention to furnishing all localities with instruction in return for their money; (5) the ministerial 
department determines one measure of remuneration, which is sufficiently high, and arbitrarily 
increases the amount from the County Council; the masses demand the greatest possible 
economy and distribute the remuneration in such a way that those whose children are taught pay 
directly. 

It seems as though it would be superfluous to expatiate on how clearly the common sense of the 
masses is expressed in these demands, in contradistinction to that artificial structure, in which, at 
its very birth, they an trying to imprison the business of popular education. Even besides this, the 
feeling of justice is involuntarily provoked against such an order of things. See what is taking 
place. The masses have felt the necessity of education, and have begun to work in the direction 
of attaining their end. In addition to all the taxes which they pay, they have voluntarily imposed 
upon themselves the tax for education, that is, they have begun to hire teachers. What have we 
done ? "Oh, you are able to pay," we said, "wait, then, for you are stupid and rude. Let us have 
the money, and we will arrange it for you in the best manner possible." 

The masses have given up their money (as I have said, in many County Councils the levy for the 
schools has been turned directly into a tax). The money was taken, and the education was 
arranged for them. 

I am not going to repeat about the artificiality of the education, but how the whole matter has 
been arranged. In Krapivensk County there are forty thousand souls, including girls, according to 
the last census. According to Bunyakovski's table of the distribution of ten thousand of the 
Orthodox population for the year 1862, there ought to be, of the male sex between six and 
fourteen years, 1,834, and of the female sex, 1,989, — in all 3,823 to each ten thousand. 
According to my own observations, there ought to be more, no doubt on account of the increase 
of the population, so that the average school population may boldly be put at four thousand. In a 
school there are, on an average, in the large centres, about sixty pupils, and in the smaller, from 
ten to twenty-five. In order that all may receive instruction, the smaller centres, forming the 
greater half of the population, need schools for ten, fifteen, and twenty pupils, so that the average 
of a school, in my opinion, would be not more than thirty pupils. How many schools are, then, 
needed for sixteen thousand pupils? Divide sixteen thousand by thirty, and we get 530 schools. 
Let us assume that, although at the opening of the schools all pupils from seven to fifteen years 


30 



of age will enter, not all will attend regularly for the period of eight years; let us reject one- 
fourth, that is 130 schools and, consequently, 4,200 pupils. Let us say that there are four hundred 
schools. Only twenty have been opened. The County Council gives two thousand roubles and has 
added one thousand roubles, making in all three thousand roubles. From some of the peasants, 
not from all, fifteen kopeks are levied from each soul, in all about four thousand roubles. On the 
building of schools seven hundred roubles are spent, and on the pedagogical courses twelve 
hundred roubles have been used in one year. But let us suppose that the County Council will act 
quite simply and sensibly, and will not waste money on pedagogical courses and other trifles; let 
us suppose that all peasants will pay the new school tax of fifteen kopeks, - what will the future 
of this matter be? From the peasants six thousand, from the County Council three thousand, in all 
nine thousand. Let us assume that ten more schools will be added. Nine thousand roubles will 
barely suffice for the support of these schools, and that only in case the school council will act 
most prudently and economically. Consequently, with the County Council administration, thirty 
schools to forty thousand of the population are the highest limit of what the dissemination of the 
schools in the county may reach. 

And this limit of the school business can be attained only if the peasants will levy fifteen kopeks 
on each soul, which is extremely doubtful, and if the disbursement of this money will be in the 
hands of the peasants, and not of the County Council. I do not speak of the possible increase of 
three thousand roubles, because this increase of three thousand roubles partly falls back on those 
same peasants, and on the other hand is not secured by anything, forming only an accidental 
means. Thus, in order to bring the business of popular education to the state in which it ought to 
be, that is, in order that there shall be four hundred schools to the forty thousand of the 
population, and in order that the schools shall not be a toy, but may answer a real want of the 
masses, there is no other issue than that the peasants be taxed, not fifteen kopeks, but three 
roubles a soul, in order that the necessary three hundred roubles to each school be obtained. Even 
then I do not see any reason for thinking that as many schools as are needed would be built. 

Do we not see that now, when the simplest arithmetical calculation shows that the only means 
for the success of the schools is the simplification of methods, the simplicity and cheapness of 
the arrangement of the school, the pedagogues are busy, as though having made a wager to 
concoct a most difficult, most complicated, and expensive (and, I must add, most bad) 
instruction? In the manuals of Messrs. Bunakov and Evtushevski I have figured up three hundred 
roubles worth of aids to instruction which, in their opinion, are absolutely necessary for the 
establishment of a primary school. All they talk about in pedagogical circles is how to prepare 
improved teachers in the seminaries, so that a village might not be able to get them even for four 
hundred roubles. On that road of perfection, on which pedagogy stands, it is quite apparent to me 
that if 120,000 roubles were collected in a county, the pedagogues would find use for them all in 
twenty schools, with adjustable tables, seminaries for teachers, and so forth. Have we not seen 
that forty schools were closed in Krapivensk County, and that those who closed them were fully 
convinced that they thus advanced the cause of education, for now they have twenty "good" 
schools? But what is most remarkable is that those who express these demands are not in the 
least interested in knowing whether the masses for whom they are preparing all these things want 
them, and still less, who is going to pay for it all. But the County Councils are so befogged by 
these demands that they do not see the simple calculation and the simple justice. 


31 



It is as though a man asked me to buy him two puds of flour for a month, and I bought him for 
that rouble a box of perfumed confectionery and reproached him for his ignorance, because he 
was dissatisfied. 

As I wish to remain true to my rule that criticism should point out how that which is not good 
ought to be, I shall try to show how the whole school business ought to be arranged, if it is not to 
be a plaything, and is to have a future. The answer is the same as to the first two questions, 
freedom. The masses must be given the freedom to arrange their schools as they wish, and as 
little as possible should any one interfere in their arrangement. Only with such a view of the 
matter will all the obstacles to the dissemination of the schools be obviated, though they have 
seemed insuperable. The chief obstacles are the insufficiency of the means and the impossibility 
of increasing them. To the first the masses reply that they are using all the measures at their 
command to make the schools cost little; to the second they reply that the means will always be 
found so long as they themselves are the masters, and that they are not willing to increase the 
means for the support of that which they do not need. 

The essential difference between the view of the people and of the ministerial department 
consists in the following: (1) In the opinion of the masses there is no one definite norm and form 
of the school, outside and below which the school is not recognized, as is assumed by the 
ministerial department; a school may be of any kind, either a very good and expensive one, or a 
very poor and cheap one, but even in a very poor one reading and writing may be learned, and, as 
in a richer parish a better pope is appointed and a better church built, so also may a better school 
be built in a wealthy village, and a poorer school in a less well-to-do village; but just as one can 
pray equally well in a poor or in a rich parish, even so it is with learning. (2) The masses regard 
as the first condition of their education an even, equal distribution of this education, though it be 
in its lowest stage, and then only they propose a further, again an even, raising of the level of 
education, while the ministerial department considers it necessary to give to a certain chosen 
few, to one-twentieth of the whole number, a specimen of education, to show them how nice it 
is. (3) The ministerial department, either unable or purposely unwilling to calculate, has raised 
the educational business to such a high, expensive level, and one which is so foreign to the 
masses, that considering the high price at which the education is acquired, no issue from that 
situation can be foreseen, and the number of learners can never be increased; but the masses, 
who know how to calculate, and who are interested in that calculation, have no doubt long ago 
figured out what I d out al 1 see as clear as daylight that those expensive schools, which cost as 
much as four hundred roubles each, may be good indeed, but are not what they need, and try in 
every way possible to diminish the expenses for their schools. 

What, then, is to be done? How are the County Councils to act in order that this business may not 
be a plaything and a pastime, but shall have a future? Let them conform with the needs of the 
masses, and, so far as possible, cheapen and free the forms of the school, and afford the 
Communes the greatest possible power in the establishment of the schools. 

For this it is necessary that the County Councils shall entirely abandon the distribution of the 
taxes to the schools and the distribution of the schools according to localities, but shall leave this 
distribution to the peasants themselves. The determination of the pay to the teacher, the hiring, 
purchase, or building of the house, the choice of place and of the teacher himself, all that ought 


32 



to be left to the peasants. The County Council, that is, the school council, should only demand 
that the Communes inform it where and on what foundations schools have been established, not 
in order that, upon learning the facts, it shall prohibit them, as is done now, but in order that, 
learning about the conditions under which the school exists, it may add (if the conditions are in 
conformity with the demands of the council) from its County Council's sums, for the support of 
the school newly founded, a certain, definite part of what the school costs the Commune: a half, 
a third, a fourth, according to the quality of the school and the means and wishes of the County 
Council. Thus, for example, a village of twenty souls hires a transient man at two roubles a 
month to teach the children. The school council, that is, a person authorized by it, of whom I 
shall speak later, upon receiving that information, invites the transient to come to him, asks him 
what he knows and how he teaches, and, if the transient is the least bit educated and does not 
represent anything harmful, apportions to him the amount determined upon by the County 
Council, one-half, one-third, or one-fourth, in precisely the same way the school council 
proceeds in reference to a clerical person hired by the Commune at five roubles per month, or in 
reference to a teacher hired at fifteen roubles per month. Of course, that is the way the school 
council acts in reference to the teachers hired by the Communes themselves; but if the 
Communes turn to the school council, the latter recommends to them teachers under the same 
conditions. But in doing so the County Council must not forget that there should not be merely 
teachers at two hundred roubles; the school council should be an employment agency for 
teachers of every description and of every price, from one rouble to thirty roubles a month. On 
buildings the school council ought not to spend or add anything, because they are one of the most 
unproductive items of expense. But the County Council ought not to disdain, as it now does, 
teachers at two, three, four, five roubles per mouth and locations in smoky huts or by rotation 
from farm to farm. 

The County Council ought to remember that the prototype of the school, that ideal toward which 
it ought to tend, is not a stone building with an iron roof, with blackboards and desks, such as we 
see in model schools, but the very hut in which the peasant lives, with those benches and tables 
on which he eats, and not a teacher in a Prince Albert or a lady teacher in a chignon, but a male 
teacher in a caftan and shirt, or a female teacher in a peasant skirt and with a kerchief on her 
head, and not with one hundred pupils, but with five, six, or ten. 

The County Council must have no bias or antipathy for certain types of teachers, as is the case at 
present. Thus, for example, the Tula County Council just now has a special bias for the type of 
school-teachers from the gymnasia and clerical schools, and the greater part of the schools in 
Tula County are in their charge. In Krapivensk County there exists a strange antipathy for 
teachers from the clerical profession, so that in this county, where there are as many as fifty 
parishes, there is not one clerical person employed as a teacher. The County Council, in 
proposing a teacher, ought to be guided by two chief considerations: in the first place, that the 
teacher should be as cheap as possible; in the second, that by his education he should stand as 
near to the masses as possible. Only thanks to the opposite view on the matter can be explained 
such an inexplicable phenomenon as that in Krapivensk County (almost the same is true of the 
whole Government and of the majority of Governments) there are fifty parishes and twenty 
schools, and that for these twenty schools there is not a single clerical teacher, although there is 
not a parish where a priest, or a deacon, or a sexton, or their daughters and wives could not be 


33 



found, who would not be glad to do the teaching for one-fourth the pay that the teachers coining 
from the city would be willing to take. 

But I shall be told: What kind of schools will those be with bigots, drunken soldiers, expelled 
scribes, and sextons? And what control can there be over those formless schools? To this I will 
reply that, in the first place, these teachers, bigots, soldiers, and sextons are not so bad as they are 
imagined to be. In my school practice I often had to do with pupils from these schools, and some 
of them could read fluently and write beautifully, and soon abandoned the bad habits which they 
brought with them from those schools. All of us know peasants who have learned the rudiments 
in such schools, and it cannot be said that this learning was useless or injurious. In the second 
place, I will say that teachers of that calibre are especially bad because they are quite abandoned 
in the backwoods and teach without any aid or instruction, and that now there is not to be found a 
single one of the old teachers who would not tell you with regret that he does not know the new 
methods and has himself learned for copper pence, and that many of them, especially the 
younger church servants, are quite willing to leam the new methods. These teachers ought not to 
be rejected without further ado as absolutely worthless. There are among them better and worse 
teachers (and I have seen some very capable ones). They ought to be compared; the better of 
them ought to be selected, encouraged, brought together with other better teachers, and 
instructed, which is quite feasible and precisely the thing in which the duty of the school council 
is to consist. 

But how are they to be controlled, watched, and taught, if they breed by the hundred in each 
county? In my opinion the work of the County Council and school council ought to consist in 
nothing but watching the pedagogical side of the business, and that is feasible, if these means 
will be taken: in every County Council, which has taken upon itself the duty of the dissemination 
of popular education, or the cooperation with it, there ought to be one person whether it be an 
unpaid member of the school council, or a man at a salary of not less than one thousand roubles, 
hired by the County Council who is to attend to the pedagogical side of the business in the 
county. That person ought to have a general, fresh education within the limits of a gymnasium 
course, that is, he must know Russian thoroughly and Church-Slavic partly, arithmetic and 
algebra thoroughly, and be a teacher, that is, know the practice of pedagogy. This person must be 
freshly educated, because I have observed that frequently the information of a man who has long 
ago finished his course even in a university, and who has not refreshed his education, is 
insufficient, not only for the guidance of teachers, but even for the examination of a village 
school. This person must by all means be a teacher himself in the same locality, in order that in 
his demands and instructions he may always have in view that pedagogical material with which 
the other teachers have to deal, and that he may sustain in himself that live relation to reality 
which is the chief preservative against error and delusion. If a County Council does not possess 
such a man and does not wish to employ one, it has, in my opinion, absolutely nothing to do with 
the popular education, except to give money, because every interference with the administrative 
side of the matter, in the way it is done now, can only be injurious. This member of the County 
Council, or the educated person hired by it, must have the best model school, with an assistant, in 
the county. In addition to conducting this school and applying to it all the newest methods of 
instruction, this head teacher ought to keep an eye on all the other schools. This school is not to 
be a model in the sense of introducing into it all kinds of cubes and pictures and all kinds of 
nonsense invented by the Germans, but the teacher in this school should experiment on just such 


34 



peasant children as the other schools consist of, in order to determine the simplest methods 
which may be adopted by the majority of the teachers, sextons, and soldiers, who form the bulk 
of all the schools. Since with the arrangement which I propose there will certainly be formed 
large complete schools in the larger centres (as I think, in the proportion of one to twenty of all 
the other schools), and in these large schools the teachers will be of a grade of education equal to 
that of the seminarists who have finished a course in a theological school, the head teacher will 
visit all these larger schools, bring together these teachers on Sundays, point out to them the 
defects, propose new methods, give counsel and books for their own education, and invite them 
to his school on Sundays. The library of the head teacher ought to consist of several copies of the 
Bible, of Church-Slavic and Russian grammars, arithmetic, and algebra. The head teacher, 
whenever he has time, will visit also the small schools and invite their teachers to come to see 
him ; but the duty of watching the minor teachers is imposed on the older teachers, who just in 
the same way visit their district and invite those teachers to come to see them on Sundays and on 
week-days. The County Council either pays the teachers for travelling, or, in adding its portion to 
what the Communes levy, makes it a condition that the Communes furnish transportation. The 
meetings of the teachers and the visits in similar or better schools are one of the chief conditions 
for the successful conduct of the business of education, and so the County Council ought to 
direct its main attention to the organization of these meetings, and not spare any money for them. 

Besides, in the large schools, where there will be more than fifty pupils, there ought to be 
chosen, instead of the assistants which they now have, such of the pupils, of either sex, as show 
marked ability for a teacher's calling, and they should be made assistants, two or three in each 
school. These assistants should receive a salary of fifty kopeks to one rouble per month, and the 
teacher should work with them separately in the evenings, so that they may not fall behind the 
others. These assistants, chosen from among the best, are to form the future teachers, to take the 
place of the lowest in the minor schools. 

Naturally the organization of these teachers' meetings, both for the smaller and the larger 
schools, and the head teacher's visits of inspection, and the formation of teachers from pupils 
acting as assistants may take place in a large variety of ways; the main point is that the 
surveillance of any number of schools (even though it may reach the norm of one school to every 
one hundred souls) is possible in this manner. With such an arrangement the teachers of both the 
large and the small schools will feel that their labours are appreciated, that they have not buried 
themselves in the backwoods without hope of salvation, that they have companions and guides, 
and that in the matter of instruction, both for their own further education and for the 
improvement of their situation, they have means for advancement. With such an arrangement, 
the devotee and the sexton who are able to learn will learn; while those who are unable or 
unwilling to do so will be replaced by some one else. 

The time of instruction ought to be, as is the wish of all peasants, during the seven winter 
months, and so the salary is to be determined by the month. With such an arrangement, leaving 
out the rapidity and the equal distribution of education, the advantage will be this, that the 
schools will be established in those centres where the necessity for them is felt by the masses, 
where they are established spontaneously and, therefore, firmly. Where the character of the 
population demands education it will be permanent. Just look: in the towns, the children of the 
innkeepers and well-to-do peasants learn to read in one way or another and never forget what 


35 



they have learned; but in the backwoods, where a landed proprietor founds a school, the children 
learn well, but in ten years all is forgotten, and the population is as illiterate as ever. For this 
reason the centres, large or small, where the schools are established spontaneously, are 
particularly precious. Where such a school has germinated, no matter how poor it be, it will 
throw out roots, and sooner or later the population will be able to read and write. Consequently, 
these sprouts ought to be deemed precious, and not be treated, as they are everywhere, they 
ought not to be forbidden, because the schools are not according to our taste, that is, the sprouts 
ought not to be killed, and branches stuck in the ground where they will not take root. 

With merely such an arrangement, without the establishment of costly and artificial seminaries, 
the chosen ones those selected from the best of the pupils themselves, and those who are 
educated in the schools will form that contingent of cheap popular teachers who will take the 
place of the soldiers and sextons and will fully satisfy all the demands of the masses and of the 
educated classes. The chief advantage of such an arrangement is that it alone gives the 
development of popular education a future, that is, takes us out from that blind alley into which 
the County Councils have gone, thanks to the expensive schools and to the absence of new 
sources for the increase of their numbers. Only when the masses themselves choose the centres 
for the schools, themselves choose teachers, determine the amount of the remuneration, and 
directly enjoy the advantages of the schools, will they be ready to add means for the schools if 
such should become necessary. I know Communes that paid fifty kopeks a soul for a school in 
each of their villages ; but it is difficult to compel the peasants to pay fifteen kopeks for a school 
in the township, if not all of them can make use of it. For the whole county, for the County 
Council, the peasants will not add a single kopek, because they feel that they will not enjoy the 
advantages of their money. Only with such an arrangement will be found soon the means for the 
proper maintenance of all schools, of one to each one hundred souls, which seems so impossible 
in the present state of affairs. 

In addition to this, with the arrangement which I propose, the interests of the peasant Communes 
and of the County Council, as the representative of the intelligence of the locality, will 
indissolubly be connected. Let us say that the County Council gives one-third of what the 
peasants give. In furnishing this amount, it will evidently, in one way or another, see to it that the 
money is not wasted, and, consequently, will also keep an eye on the two-thirds given by the 
peasant Communes. The peasant Commune sees that the County Council gives its part, and so 
admits the right of the Council to follow the progress of the instruction. At the same time, it has 
an object-lesson in the difference which exists between a school maintained at a smaller and that 
maintained at a greater expense, and chooses the one which it needs or which is more accessible 
to it in accordance with its means. 

I will again take Krapiveusk County, with which I am familiar, to show what difference the 
proposed arrangement would make. I cannot have the slightest doubt that the moment permission 
is granted to open schools, wherever wanted and of any description desired, there will at once 
appear very many schools. I am convinced that in Krapivensk County, in which there are fifty 
parishes, there will always be a school in each parish, because the parishes are always centres of 
population, and because among the church servants there will always be found one who is 
capable of teaching, likes to teach, and will find his advantage in it. In addition to the schools 
maintained by the church servants there will be opened those forty schools that have been closed 


36 



(more correctly thirty, because ten of them were church schools), and there will be opened very 
many new schools, so that in a very short time there will be not far from four hundred instead of 
the twenty at present. 

I may be believed or not, but I will assume that in Krapivensk County 380 additional schools will 
be opened, the moment they are given over to the masses, so that there will be four hundred in 
all, and I will try to determine whether the existence of these four hundred schools, that is, of 
twenty times as many as at present, is possible under the conditions which I have assumed in 
discussing the existing order. 

Assuming that all peasants pay fifteen kopeks per soul, and the County Council gives three 
thousand roubles, there will be nine thousand roubles, which will suffice only for thirty schools 
with the former arrangement. But with the new arrangement: 

I assume that ten of the old schools are left intact; in these schools the teachers get twenty 
roubles per month, which, for the seven winter months, amounts to fourteen hundred roubles. I 
assume that in every parish there will be established a school with the teacher's salary at five 
roubles per month, which, for fifty schools, amounts to 1,750 roubles. 

I assume the remaining 340 schools are of the cheap character, at two roubles per month; fifteen 
roubles for each of the 340 schools makes 5,100 roubles. 

Thus the four hundred schools will demand an expenditure in salaries amounting to 8,250 
roubles. There are still left 750 roubles for school appliances and transportation. 

The figures for the teachers' wages are not chosen arbitrarily by me: on the other hand, the 
expensive teachers are given a larger salary than they now get by the month for the whole year. 
Even so, the amount apportioned to the church servants is what they now receive in the majority 
of cases. But the cheap schools at two roubles per mouth are assumed by me at a higher rate than 
what the peasants in reality pay, so that the calculation may boldly be accepted. In this 
calculation is included the kernel of ten chief teachers and ten or more church servant teachers. It 
is evident that only with such a calculation will the school business be placed on a serious and 
possible basis and have a clear and definite future. 

If what I have pointed out does not convince anybody that will mean that I did not express 
clearly what I wanted to say, and do not wish to enter into any disputes with anybody. I know 
that no deaf people are so hopeless as those who do not want to hear. I know how it is with 
farmers. A new threshing-machine has been bought at a great expense, and it is put up and 
started threshing. It threshes miserably, no matter how you set the screw; it threshes badly, and 
the grain falls into the straw. There is a loss, and it is as clear as can be that the machine ought to 
be abandoned and another means be employed for threshing, but the money has been spent and 
the threshing-machine is put up. "Let her thresh," says the master. Precisely the same thing will 
happen with this matter. I know that for a long time to come there will flourish the object 
instruction, and cubes, and buttons instead of arithmetic, and hissing and sputtering, in teaching 
the letters, and twenty expensive schools of the German pattern, instead of the needed four 


37 



hundred popular, cheap schools. But I know just as surely that the common sense of the Russian 
nation will not permit this false, artificial system of instruction to be foisted upon it. 

The masses are the chief interested person and the judge, and now do not pay a particle of 
attention to our more or less ingenious discussions about the manner in which the spiritual food 
of education is best to be prepared for them. They do not care, because they are firmly convinced 
that in the great business of their mental development they will not make a false step and will not 
accept what is bad, and it would be like making pease stick to the wall to attempt to educate, 
direct, and teach them in the German fashion. 


38 



